


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Submit Your Product or Invention Idea | Davison












1-800-326-4807

Submit Your Idea
Our inventing team has been helping individuals with their product ideas for 25 years. We design and develop working product samples and present them to corporations.






Get help with your idea
Complete the Idea Security Agreement for your free Inventor's Guide!




First Name



Last Name





Address





City



State



Zip Code





Country

  UNITED STATES
  AFGHANISTAN
  ALBANIA
  ALGERIA
  AMERICAN SAMOA
  ANDORRA
  ANGOLA
  ANGUILLA
  ANTARCTICA
  ANTIGUA AND BARBUDA
  ARGENTINA
  ARMENIA
  ARUBA
  AUSTRALIA
  AUSTRIA
  AZERBAIJAN
  BAHAMAS
  BAHRAIN
  BANGLADESH
  BARBADOS
  BELARUS
  BELGIUM
  BELIZE
  BENIN
  BERMUDA
  BHUTAN
  BOLIVIA
  BOSNIA HERCEGOVINA
  BOTSWANA
  BOUVET ISLAND
  BRAZIL
  BRITISH INDIAN OCEAN TERRITORY
  BRUNEI DARUSSALAM
  BULGARIA
  BURKINA FASO
  BURUNDI
  BYELORUSSIAN SSR
  CAMBODIA
  CAMEROON
  CANADA
  CAPE VERDE
  CAYMAN ISLANDS
  CENTRAL AFRICAN REPUBLIC
  CHAD
  CHILE
  CHINA
  CHRISTMAS ISLAND
  COCOS (KEELING) ISLANDS
  COLOMBIA
  COMOROS
  CONGO, REPUBLIC OF
  CONGO, THE DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC OF
  COOK ISLANDS
  COSTA RICA
  COTE D'IVOIRE
  CROATIA
  CUBA
  CYPRUS
  CZECH REPUBLIC
  CZECH REPUBLIC
  DENMARK
  DJIBOUTI
  DOMINICA
  DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
  TIMOR-LESTE
  ECUADOR
  EGYPT
  EL SALVADOR
  ENGLAND
  EQUATORIAL GUINEA
  ERITREA
  ESTONIA
  ETHIOPIA
  FALKLAND ISLANDS (MALVINAS)
  FAROE ISLANDS
  FIJI
  FINLAND
  FRANCE
  FRENCH GUIANA
  FRENCH POLYNESIA
  FRENCH SOUTHERN TERRITORIES
  GABON
  GAMBIA
  GEORGIA
  GERMANY
  GHANA
  GIBRALTAR
  GREAT BRITAIN
  GREECE
  GREENLAND
  GRENADA
  GUADELOUPE
  GUAM
  GUATEMALA
  GUERNSEY
  GUINEA
  GUINEA-BISSAU
  GUYANA
  HAITI
  HEARD ISLAND AND MCDONALD ISLANDS
  HONDURAS
  HONG KONG
  HUNGARY
  ICELAND
  INDIA
  INDONESIA
  IRAN, ISLAMIC REPUBLIC OF
  IRAQ
  IRELAND
  ISLE OF MAN
  ISRAEL
  ITALY
  JAMAICA
  JAPAN
  JERSEY
  JORDAN
  KAZAKHSTAN
  KENYA
  KIRIBATI
  NORTH KOREA
  SOUTH KOREA
  KUWAIT
  KYRGYZSTAN
  LAO PEOPLE'S DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC
  LATVIA
  LEBANON
  LESOTHO
  LIBERIA
  LIBYAN ARAB JAMAHIRIYA
  LIECHTENSTEIN
  LITHUANIA
  LUXEMBOURG
  MACAU
  MACEDONIA, REPUBLIC OF
  MADAGASCAR
  MALAWI
  MALAYSIA
  MALDIVES
  MALI
  MALTA
  MARSHALL ISLANDS
  MARTINIQUE
  MAURITANIA
  MAURITIUS
  MAYOTTE
  MEXICO
  MICRONESIA, FEDERATED STATES OF
  MOLDOVA, REPUBLIC OF
  MONACO
  MONGOLIA
  MONTSERRAT
  MOROCCO
  MOZAMBIQUE
  MYANMAR
  NAMIBIA
  NAURU
  NEPAL
  NETHERLANDS
  NETHERLANDS ANTILLES
  NEUTRAL ZONE
  NEW CALEDONIA
  NEW ZEALAND
  NICARAGUA
  NIGER
  NIGERIA
  NIUE
  NORFOLK ISLAND
  NORTHERN MARIANA ISLANDS
  NORWAY
  OMAN
  PAKISTAN
  PALAU
  PANAMA
  PAPUA NEW GUINEA
  PARAGUAY
  PERU
  PHILIPPINES
  PITCAIRN
  POLAND
  PORTUGAL
  PUERTO RICO
  QATAR
  REUNION
  ROMANIA
  RUSSIA
  RWANDA
  SAINT HELENA
  SAINT KITTS AND NEVIS
  SAINT LUCIA
  SAINT PIERRE AND MIQUELON
  SAINT VINCENT AND THE GRENADINES
  SAMOA
  SAN MARINO
  SAUDI ARABIA
  SENEGAL
  SEYCHELLES
  SIERRA LEONE
  SINGAPORE
  SLOVAKIA
  SLOVENIA
  SOLOMON ISLANDS
  SOMALIA
  SOUTH AFRICA
  SGATSI
  SPAIN
  SRI LANKA
  SUDAN
  SURINAME
  SVALBARD AND JAN MAYEN ISLANDS
  SWAZILAND
  SWEDEN
  SWITZERLAND
  SYRIAN ARAB REPUBLIC
  TAIWAN
  TAJIKISTAN
  TANZANIA, UNITED REPUBLIC OF
  THAILAND
  TOGO
  TOKELAU
  TONGA
  TRINIDAD AND TOBAGO
  TUNISIA
  TURKEY
  TURKMENISTAN
  TURKS AND CAICOS ISLANDS
  TUVALU
  UGANDA
  UKRAINE
  UNITED ARAB EMIRATES
  UNITED KINGDOM
  URUGUAY
  USSR
  UZBEKISTAN
  VANUATU
  HOLY SEE (VATICAN CITY STATE)
  VENEZUELA
  VIET NAM
  VIRGIN ISLANDS (BRITISH)
  VIRGIN ISLANDS (U.S.)
  WALLIS AND FUTUNA
  WESTERN SAHARA
  YEMEN
  YUGOSLAVIA
  ZAIRE
  ZAMBIA
  ZIMBABWE
  OTHER (NOT LISTED)





Email



Phone




By clicking the “Next” button below as my electronic signature, I expressly consent to being contacted about Davison’s services by phone call, auto-dialed phone call including prerecorded voice messages, text messages or email at any number or email address I provide. I understand that my consent is not a requirement for purchase of services.





Fee based service


Step 1 of 4








Our products have sold in over 1200 stores, including:


Our method is 100%  Confidential and Secure





































Fast, Quick, & Fair Business Funding | Instant Business Loans, Cash, & Funding | Business Factoring Services | Fast Capital 360








































































































 
 
 



Programs

Small Business Funding
Merchant Cash Advances
Business Line of Credit
Bad Credit Loans
SBA Loans
Unsecured Business Funding
Cash Flow
Short Term Business Funding
Working Capital
Microloans


Why Us?
Company
FAQs
Reviews
Careers
Contact
  (800) 735-6107
Apply Now
 













 





Exceptional Business Funding That is Fast, Simple & Transparent 

Estimate Your Terms 

This will not affect your credit score 

 


 



 















×
Need a quick estimate?Results within seconds!
Based on this informationYou may qualify for









$


*Please enter in valid Annual Revenue








FastCapital360 will not share your information with 3rd parties.Your security and privacy are our priority.










Ready to get started?
Apply Now
This tool creates an estimate based on your annual revenue and time in business. This is not a guaranteed offer of funding. Whether your business would qualify for funding is subject to full underwriting and lender approval.Need more than the estimate?Call a Business Advisor at (800)-735-6107.

















Apply Take 10 minutes to fill out basic financial information and apply for the amount of funding you need.   


Get Approved 99% of our applicants receive approval status within 1 hour of completing our online application.   


Start Using Your Funds Once approved, cash will be funded to your bank account within 1 business day.   


Get Started! Apply within minutes and get approved today!
Apply Today!   

























We’ve provided over $300 million in funding to more than 12,000 businesses.


Fast & Transparent Funding With Innovation & Reliability




$300 MillionFunded to Businesses

$300 Million Funded to BusinessesSince its inception in 2009, Fast Capital 360 has funded more than $300 million to thousands of businesses across the United States, in hundreds of different industries.   




Expertly TrainedLoyal Personal Advisors 

Expertly Trained Loyal Personal AdvisorsLoyal personal advisors focused on the most efficient way to help grow your business from start to finish. Anytime.  




60 MinutesAverage Approval Time

60 Minutes Average Approval TimeThanks to a cutting-edge, paperless pre-application process, Fast Capital 360 is able to approve most programs in less than an hour.  




We Value Your TimeYour Time is Money

Your Time is MoneyWe value that. Our process is fast and our advisors are always accessible, ready, and responsive.  




300 BusinessesFunded Every Month

300 Business Funded Every MonthOur mission is to be an asset and a resource to businesses. We've assisted an average of 300 businesses every month thus far.
  




Flexible FundsMultiple Options

Flexible Funds with Multiple OptionsOne place, multiple options for inventory, expansion, equipment, working capital and more.  




98%Satisfaction Rating

98% Satisfaction RatingWe put our customers first, and own a 98% satisfaction rating. Check out our reviews on TrustPilot. Trustpilot Reviews  




Data SecurityAdvanced Bank-Grade Security 

We Take Security SeriouslyWe use the most advanced bank-grade security to connect to view your business accounts. We never capture or store your personal information.  Pay Only For What You Use, With No Hidden Costs or Prepayment PenaltiesIntroducing Streamline Revolving Business Credit
Up to $50,000 revolving business credit.
No obligation to take funds.
Straight forward transparent fees with no surprises.
No prepayment penalty.
Borrow more as you repay.
Never pay double interest.

As a small business owner, you require flexibility. Streamline revolving business credit gives you the flexibility to draw the working capital that you need, when you need it. You pay only for the money that you use, with no hidden costs or prepayment penalties. Running a small business is hard. Getting access to the working capital you need is easy.Apply Now!


Getting started is fast, easy, and won’t impact your credit score.





Instant Business Financing: Your Way Forward
Taking your business to the next level requires a few things: hard work, ingenuity, determination and the cash flow to make your vision a reality. Money doesn’t grow on trees, but it does grow companies.
You guide the funding, we provide it. Simple. Quick. Transparent.
In the rapidly-changing world of commerce, businesses require solutions that move just as fast as the economy they are a part of. Cash flow loans shouldn’t require waiting months; they should enable owners and operators to get the job done as soon as they can.
Old-school avenues to small business financing require six-month waiting periods, excellent credit history and filling out dozens of pages of paperwork. Bank loans are often reserved for those with excellent credit, plenty of collateral and the luxury of being able to wait months for approval. Traditional lenders make their process time-consuming and complex, with multiple identity checks and proofs of ownership. Our business financing ethos is different.
Fast Capital 360 gives you the amount of funding you need in days, not weeks or months. We’ve built our business funding company around the idea that you shouldn’t have to wait, you should be able to receive your cash flow quickly.
Since 2009, our instant small business financing services have enabled thousands of companies to realize their fullest potential. We believe in the power of the local economy, and we want to influence it to do great things; that’s why we work with small business owners across the country.  Our instant business loans fuel innovation from coast to coast.
Whether you’re in the market for SBA loans or unsecured funding, we’re here to provide you with the funds you need.


HOW FAST IS FAST?10 minutes stands between you and knowing how much funding you qualify for. Your small business loan can arrive in your bank account in as little as one business day. No collateral required.
The average online application process takes less than 10 minutes and is only a page long. Once your financing program is approved, your working capital funding can arrive by the end of the next business day.
WE KEEP THINGS EASY & QUICKThere are no long clauses to wade through, no complicated terms and conditions, just plain language that clearly defines what you’re getting in a fast approval business loan. Fast Capital 360 is a member of the Responsible Business Lending Coalition; we were founded on the principles of lending fairness and transparency. We aren’t here to put you in debt; we’re here to fund the American dream.
QUALIFICATIONS?To qualify for instant funding, your small business needs to have been in operation for more than a year, have a revenue of at least $180,000, and you need to have a personal credit score of 500 or more. Our quick business lending is unsecured, so you don’t have to pledge personal assets or collateral just to receive a loan.



Get a Business Loan Today
We designed our process around getting small businesses the money they need quickly. Fast is in our name for a reason. Our application takes next to no time so you can get back to doing what you do best — running your business.
We’ve been voted the best small business funding company by CrowdReviews.com because of our dedication to supporting the economy that we are all a part of with fast approval loans.
The process of receiving funding for your expansion, your repairs, your staffing or your vision shouldn’t make running your business any more difficult. This is instant business funding without the hassle. We want you to have your money quick; you probably have better things to do than wait around for an approval letter.
From microloans to new property purchases, our fast funding process has been there for thousands of businesses. We offer multiple business loan options from lending that functions like a credit card to those that work the same as a bank loan, all with cash delivered faster than ever before.
Whether you have questions about receiving instant restaurant funding or your current working capital funding, our small business advisors are standing by six days a week to help.
Business factoring services allow you to know the exact amount you’ll pay and make our funding work even faster. Through our proprietary business analysis, we determine a precise factor rate that is included in our financing program. This business factor rate is included in the fast approval loan. Where banks charge interest rates, our business factoring services clearly outline how much is to be included in each payment from the start to the finish of the term.
Rather than taking out another credit card, our online business lending services allows you a safer alternative that provides you with more accessible business cash and less likelihood of accruing debt. Better than the banks, our commercial financing programs get business owners the money they need faster than anyone else.
A quick business funding solution that encompasses every need? That’s Fast Capital 360.
Still on the fence?
For more information on why Fast Capital 360 is the best choice for shaping your business into what you know it can be, call us today at 800-735-6107 or contact us online.
























  Trustpilot  






Funding Types 




SBA Loans
Online Business Financing
Merchant Cash Advances
Cash Flow Lenders
Business Funding Options







Unsecured Business Funding
Working Capital Financing
Bad Credit Loans
Line of Credit
Inventory Financing
Business Loan For Women



 



 



Our Funding

 Overview 
 Why Choose Us 
 Industries We Serve 
 Do You Qualify 



 



About FC360 




 Working With Us 
 Company 
 Testimonials 
 FAQs 







 Privacy Policy 
 Legal 
 Giving Back 
 Sitemap 
 Contact Us 







Follow Us
FacebookTwitterLinkedin



 



Business Center 




Small Business Blog
Short Term Funding
Small Business Funding
Business Equipment Funding





Contact Us
 Phone: (800) 735-6107


 
 












 Trustpilot 


© Copyright Fast Capital 360. Fast Capital 360 is a D/B/A of iVest 360, LLC. - 95 James Way #113
Southampton, PA 18966
	




















Programs

Small Business Funding
Merchant Cash Advances
Business Line of Credit
Bad Credit Loans
SBA Loans
Unsecured Business Funding
Cash Flow
Short Term Business Funding
Working Capital
Microloans


Why Us?
Company
FAQs
Reviews
Careers
Contact
  (800) 735-6107
Apply Now































需要安全验证




Facebook加入或登录 Facebook   邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？登录想加入 Facebook 吗？注册注册安全验证码请输入以下文本看不清楚上面的文字？换一个或播放语音验证信息框中文字：这是什么？安全验证这是一个标准的安全测试，用于阻止垃圾邮件制造者创建假帐户并向用户发送垃圾信息。提交中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017


       BDS list - Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid                                               Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                 Eden Springs Water: Think Before You Drink    Eden Springs Water: Think Before You Drink A report by BDSlist.org With today’s colossal corporations that span the globe, it can be confusing to identify products that should be subject to BDS, the international campaign using Boycott, Divestment and Sanctions to compel Israel to abide by international law.  One such product is Eden Springs Water. An Israeli company, Eden Springs delivers over 680 million litres of water across 18 countries, making it one of the world’s leading providers of bottled water in the workplace.  Despite its name, however, this lucrative corporation did not begin as a pristine gift from nature; it began and continues to operate as an illegal occupation of the Golan Heights. Read More       1 year ago   BDS, Eden, Eden Springs, Golan Heights, Rhone Capital, Salukia Springs, Water, WHO, • Mayanot Eden, • Mayanot Tamda, • Mayanot Tamra, • Mey Eden   Consumer             Israel Military Industries      Israel Military Industries at LAAD Defence & Security Exhibit, Brazil 2015   Israel Military Industries  By Alastair Sloan  Sale of Uzi manufacturer highlights Israeli hypocrisy towards arms trade  Israel Military Industries (IMI), the state-owned weapons designer and manufacturer, has been put up for privatisation. If there is one company that encapsulates Israel’s hypocritical approach to the arms trade, crime and human rights, it is IMI; and if there is one weapon, it is IMI’s “Uzi”, the iconic sub-machine gun which for many decades was the company’s darkest jewel. The Uzi factory is the latest component of IMI to hit the market, with investors already gobbling up other parts of the IMI estate greedily.* Read More       2 years ago   Alastair Sloan, Haganah, IMI, Israel Military Industries, Israel Weapon Industries, IWI, uzi   Security and Weapons             Moroccanoil — Israeli beauty products that glamorize apartheid   Moroccanoil — Israeli beauty products that glamorize apartheid By Sarah Irving  This post is inspired by my umpteenth conversation with a friend who’s been shocked to find out that Moroccanoil — a hair treatment whose bright turquoise publicity material seems to grace half the beauty salons in Britain — is actually Israeli. In fact, I’ve even come across people who actively sought out Moroccanoil, deceived by its name into thinking they were buying a North African product. Yes, the argan oil that is a key ingredient to the product is from beans sourced in Morocco (apparently). And it is North African Arab and Berber women who have used the oil for many years as a skin and hair treatment. But the product called Moroccanoil — and some other argan-oil based hair treatments — is actually manufactured in Israel Read More       2 years ago   argan oil, hasbara, Israeli beauty products that glamorize apartheid, Moroccanoil, Sarah Irving   Consumer                          3        Pastures of Eden Feta   Pastures of Eden and its umbrella group Tnuva has been the target of boycotts for several years as it is in the face of Trader Joe’s customers across the US. Tnuva is the largest dairy producer in Israel with about $1.8 billion in revenues. Tvenu, with 70% market share has actually been the target of  boycotts by Israelis because it has exploited its dominant market share to increase prices higher than many customers felt justifiable. Read More       2 years ago   Consumer                          6           Elbit Systems   Founded in 1967, the Israeli company Elbit Systems has become one of the world’s premiere “security and defence,” firms, specializing in military electronics, surveillance systems, Unmanned Air Vehicles (UAVs or “drones”), and security systems. It is a symbol for the Israeli economy, which essentially thrives on and fuels war, repression and control in Palestine and around the globe.  Read More       3 years ago   Apartheid Wall, Divestment, Drones, Elbit Systems   Security and Weapons             Sabra Dipping Co, LLC    A report by BDSlist.org Specialising in dips popular in the Mediterranean region, the Sabra Company is now owned by two independent, global food companies – PepsiCo, based in the US, and Strauss Group, based in Israel. (For Strauss Group’s other brands, see here.) The term “sabra” is Israeli slang for a Jewish person born in historical Palestine.  The term “sabra” also refers to an extensively upgraded M60 Patton military tank developed by Israel Military Industries.  The company is a subsidiary of Blue & White Foods, LLC, whose name refers to the colours of the Israeli flag. Read More       3 years ago   Consumer             The List           CATEGORY BRAND    Homeware   SodaStream*     Toys/educational   AMAV toys (e.g. Bracelet Weaving Kit, Sweet Art Cupcake Decorating Set, Brickle Bricks.)     Cosmetics   Ahava (e.g. Dead Sea Water Mineral Shower Gel, Dermud Intensive Foot Cream)     Food Products   Eden Water  (bottled and plumbed water coolers)      Abadi Bakery* (e.g. Mediterranean Savory Cookies)      Carmel Winery* (e.g. Carmel Limited Edition, Carmel Mediterranean)     Fresh Produce   Mehadrin* (e.g. “Jaffa” oranges, Greek yoghurt)      Jordan River* (dates)     Hardware   Stanley Black & Decker (e.g. drills, microwave, juicers)     Clothing/Personal Care   Delta Galil Industries (e.g. textiles found in Victoria’s Secret, Gap, J-Crew, J.C. Penny, Calvin Klein)      Full List                Tweets from https://twitter.com/BDSlist/lists/bds-community                   Ahava beauty products   Ahava directly violates the Geneva Convention which states that the natural resources of an occupied land cannot be used for the economic benefit of the occupier.  Read More       3 years ago   Consumer                      2           Israeli dates   Nearly half of the illegal settlements in the Jordan Valley grow dates and it’s their most profitable crop contributing significantly to their economic viability. That profitability involves illegal underpayment of Palestinian workers, exploitation of child labor and dispossession of Palestinian farmers from their land. Boycotting Israeli dates is one of the most direct ways to target illegal settlements. Read More       3 years ago   Consumer            Load More   Loading        Follow @BDSlist                                         Full List - BDS list                                                      Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                  Full List                   CONSUMER         Homeware   SodaStream*   Lees Carpets   Keter Plastics   Caesaria Carpets*      Mapal Plastics*   Carmel Carpets*   Palphot Stationery   Shaked Carpets      Brooklinen Bedding        Toys/educational   AMAV toys   Tiny Love   Taf Toys   Tip Top Toys Star      Interstar   Halilit   Edushape  Ofrat Baby Toys    Cosmetics   Ahava   Dead Sea   -417   Vivo      Nevo   Sea Spa & Sea of Spa   Moroccanoil  Sabon     Mogador   The Body Shop  L’OREAL  Desheli    Medical   Teva Pharmaceuticals   Lithotech Medical*              Food Products  Eden Water*  Osem   Sabra Dipping Co   Habait      Abadi Bakery*   Adanim Tea Co*   Ahdut Sweets*   Almog Tradex*      Psagot Winery*   Shamir Salads*   Teperberg 1870   Tishbi Estate Winery      Yarden   Strauss Group   Max Brenner  Carmel Winery     Barkan Winery   Binyamina Winery   Golan Heights Winery  Tempo Beer Industries     Aroma Nama*   Pastures of Eden Feta   B&W Foods Tribe Hummus           Fresh Produce   Mehadrin (Jaffa)   Carmel-Agrexco*   Tivall   Arava      Aluma*   Ada Fresh*   Arava*   Eitan & Inon Herbs*      Hadiklaim   Jordan River   King Solomon       Morten Export*   Tamar Hazahad*   Tekoa Mushroom      Hardware   Stanley Black & Decker   Lipski   Alibert   Curver      Jardin   Contico   Zag      Clothing/Accessories   Delta Galil Industries   Home Skinovations   Sabon Israeli diamonds    Castro  Victoria’s Secret      Online MyHeritage.com AirBnB* (linked to Aljazeera: Price of renting Airbnb on illegal Israeli settlements)  WIX.com (including DeviantArt)  Viber    INDUSTRY         Technical   Tescom Software Testing Systems   AFCON Control & Automation   Contel ITS   Maran Engineering      Amimon   Bar Ilan University   Perion Network   Conduit     Financial   Discount Bank*   Arison*   Hamashbir Holdings   Hapoalim Bank      Gemini Israel Ventures   Landmark Ventures   Leumi Bank   Mizrahi Tefahot Bank*      B Gaon Holdings        Construction & Production   Caterpillar   Barad Co   DNM Technical*   Yamit ELI Filtration      Distek   Extal*   Nesher* Automotive Equipment Group     Readymix Industries*   JCB      Security   G4S*   El Far Electronic   Motorola Solutions   Shamrad Electronics      Radwin*  Star Night Tech Samy Katsav Group ODF Optronics     Hewlett Packard (HP)        Weapons   Rafael Advanced Defense Systems   Contact Int’l   Elbit   Israel Aerospace Industries     Israel Military Industries  Israel Weapon Industries  Samy Katsav Group Defense Industries Int’l    *doing business directly involved in the Occupied Territories and illegal settlements              Join the conversation  Cancel Reply        Notify me of follow-up comments by email. Notify me of new posts by email.              Reply      Subeena - 2 years ago     Should be boycott coke, Pepsi and Mcdonalds ?              Reply      Brenda (admin) - 2 years ago     We are here focused on companies based primarily in Israel and the Occupied Palestinian Territories. While there has been interest in boycotting international companies doing business with Israel, we feel the emphasis on Israeli companies better serves to bring attention to the illegal and unethical actions of the Israeli government.              Reply      bernadette phillips - 1 year ago     BRENDA – ADMIN Please see my post on Manchester City FC’s decision to accept sponsorship deal with WIX.COM to host all their websites for fans and players linking mcfc clubs in NY and Melbourne – WIX HAVE headquarters in Israel – subsidised and backed by the state of Israel and now reaching millions of people worldwide                Reply      Colin Redmond - 1 year ago     Yes, they should be boycotted for many reasons other than support for Israeli apartheid.                Reply      charles blake - 2 years ago     i was looking for a list of musicians who’ve performed in Israel….?….(Just got caught out by martha wainwright gig last week etc. in UK)              Reply      Brenda (admin) - 2 years ago     We haven’t found a specific list yet, but we’ll see what we can do to create one! Any help is greatly appreciated. For now, here’s an article on the call for cultural boycott in action for 2014 http://www.pacbi.org/etemplate.php?id=2648&key=musicians              Reply      Gayyle - 1 year ago     Big time companies that support Israel and actively cause oppression, torture, and killing of Palestinians by the Military using their products.  ***Hewlett Packard and Motorola! !!                  Reply      Jose - 2 years ago     Should we boycott Caterpillar as well?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Most certainly Caterpillar should be targeted for boycott and divestment actions as its militarized bulldozers and equipment are regularly used in the demolition of Palestinian homes and farms and during Israeli invasions of Gaza. The Presbyterian Church USA, Quaker Friends Fiduciary Corporation (FFC) and The United Church of Christ have all passed successful divestment resolutions against the company.                Reply      ddffd - 2 years ago     here is a list for you http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_multinationals_with_research_and_development_centres_in_Israel              Reply      Jocelyn Bouchard - 2 years ago     How Palestine will be affected with the boycott of Israel?              Reply      Brenda (admin) - 2 years ago     A good question, and one we aim to publish a full article on in due course. The key consideration is that the Palestinians themselves asked for (and continue to be supportive of) an international bds action in solidarity with their struggle for justice. The livelihoods of Palestinians are already severely restrained and dictated by Israel. The ultimate goal of equitable, peaceful and respectful co-existence in historical Palestine far outweighs any temporary hurdles that may arise as a result of bds.                Reply      Becky isais - 2 years ago     Let our wallets be our tanks              Reply      S - 2 years ago     I’m wondering if it’s a good idea to label Israeli products in the supermarket to raise the profile of the boycott and, where could I get such stickers anyway?              Reply      Brenda (admin) - 2 years ago     Such stickers are available from the Palestine Solidarity Campaign in the UK, http://www.palestinecampaign.org/products-page/shop/badges/bds-stickers/. Similar are available from other BDS organisations internationally. Please be aware of and abide by any restrictions placed by store policies and by local laws; proceed with caution.              Reply      Jon - 2 years ago     Be careful it is criminal damage and my friend got caught and now has a criminal record                Reply      Tarin - 2 years ago     hi I thought I read somewhere that Home Depot was on the boycott list. Is this true?              Reply      Brenda (admin) - 2 years ago     The list here on bdslist.org focuses on Israeli companies doing business internationally. As Home Depot is an American company, we have not included it here. Home Depot has, however, been included on more comprehensive lists because of its strong corporate support for Israel. It is up to the individual to decide on the breadth of his or her own boycott decisions. Here are two profiles on Home Depot that may be of interest: http://www.cjpmo.org/DisplayDocument.aspx?DocumentID=1603 and http://www.inminds.com/boycott-home-depot.html.              Reply      Davide Benkirane - 1 year ago     I have boycotted them long ago for their support of the Zionist party                Reply      Chouaib Boukaftane - 1 year ago     Are brands like Coca Cola, Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger, Starbucks on the list of BDS?The list given above doesn’t include any well known international clothing company. Do you have such list? Thanks              Reply      Ruben Quintana - 1 year ago     Add Johnson and Johnson products to your list. http://www.jnj.com/sites/default/files/pdf/Subsidiaries.pdf When looking at big conglomerates, each company has to provide a complete list of all subsidiaries and country of origin, so future investors are fully informed.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     “Israeli companies and international firms that participate in Israel’s human rights violations” are the focus of BDS. It is true what is stated on bdsmovement.net that “Consumer boycotts are most effective when they are targeted, strategic, based on accurate data and have the potential to win wide support.” Given the nature of global capitalism, many international companies have different types of presence in Israel but only those international companies that actively participate in the occupation (like G4S, Caterpillar, Hewlett Packard) are the target of boycotts.                Reply      William Poirier - 1 year ago     money talks              Reply      jamal ghannam - 1 year ago     great job              Reply      Aaqib - 1 year ago     Boycott israell              Reply      Gretchen - 1 year ago     Also read somewhere not to buy Victoria’s Secret clothing.              Reply      Talha - 1 year ago     I had to say as a muslim i am in so much happy to see that people have finally gotten mature enough to to look past the religious differences and pointing out what is wrong and what is right. Though the list doesn’t contain any thing that is sold in Pakistan. I will try to make a list of the Israel brand and upload here love                Reply      Tania - 1 year ago     One product at a time to target is more efficient and easier to colaborate everwhere              Reply      Jane - 1 year ago     I noticed The Body Shop selling Dead Sea products, despite their statements that they participate in using products from areas that they are fairly paying the indigenous peoples. Should they be added or boycotted ? In my humble opinion, yes and would like assistance in doing so. Thanks, Jane Zacher Student and activist Philadelphia PA              Reply      Eric - 1 year ago     In the US Markets Hygiene & Cosmetics products sold by Walmart, Wallgreen’s and Safeway under the brand “Fresh & Go” are MADE IN #APARTHEID #israel … Ref: http://www.buyisraelgoods.org/scripts/mrkt_Home.asp?market_id=1&category_id=4  Feel free to use “www.BuyIsraelGoods.org” to complete and verify your list, heck they did extensive research paid by zionists , let’s use it (:^) !!! A form of political aïkido: Use the huge resources of the opposition to hasten their own downfall: Hajime – IPPON! (;^) …              Reply      William Poirier - 1 year ago     some things are easy to avoid,and boycott,,,,like BLACK and DECKER,,,,,,,,I do not buy their products,,,,,TEVA from a medical stand point is also as easy since their are other products in the market,,,,,,these are some things,,,,I do write to companies and tell the about hte BDS              Reply      Jane Zacher - 1 year ago     I noticed The Body Shop, carrying Dead Sea items. Their corporate brand, states economy and local community friendly. They should be on the list, especially if they are marketing, and profiting, from a slogan, that is false.                Reply      Gayle - 1 year ago     How about Hewlett Packard and Motorola? They are big time supporters of Israel. I heard Apple and Samsung are also.              Reply      Daniela Fernandes - 1 year ago     Hello! My cable/phone/internet operator MEO (Portugal) has recently added an israeli channel. What should I do?              Reply      K. Ibrahim. - 1 year ago     The companies enlisted should have had the respective logo’s, so that they can be easily identified.              Reply      Eric - 1 year ago     Just to follow via e-mail ‘cuz the link of my original comment expired and since there’s “wordpress” Follow button (or like (;^) ) I Figued I have to comment to follow your blog… Keep up the good work!              Reply      Ketil N - 1 year ago     I wonder if the ancestry business My Heritage is ok to buy sevices from.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Thank you for bringing the MyHeritage.com website to our attention. The site boasts on its career page that “MyHeritage is one of the top consumer web companies in Israel” and as such it is a prime target for boycott. A portion of all money spent on its services goes to the Israeli government in taxes and is used to perpetuate the violations of international laws that BDS aims to stop. It has been added to our list.                Reply      Laura Fawzia - 1 year ago     And obviosuly Air BnB now.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Of course, given their listing of properties in illegal settlements! Added!                Reply      Romarl - 1 year ago     I want to take part in the work of BDS, please advise how to.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Thank you for your interest in supporting BDS, this urgent movement for Palestinian Human Rights and an end to Israeli violations of International law. The greatest help you could offer our site is writing stories about the different brands and products on our list. This site is proving a remarkably useful resource for people around the world, with hundreds of unique visitors daily. Building this site can help the BDS achieve its goals!                Reply      IV - 1 year ago     DeSheli is an Israeli brand of hygiene products, please add them!              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Added, thank you! Would you be interested in writing a short piece about the company and its role in aiding Israeli policies? Please drop us a line if you are.                Reply      eoin - 1 year ago     What about McDonald’s and kfc etc              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Excellent question. The immediate targets of BDS for active campaigning are selected for a variety of reasons, including context sensitivity, how much they contribute to the occupation, and the possibility of success. Currently the Palestinian BDS National Committee, from who we take our tactical cues and strategic direction, do not seem to be targeting KFC and McDonalds. This does not mean they will not be targets in the future.                Reply      Mark - 1 year ago     Why is MyHeritage.com on the list?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     MyHeritage.com is an Israeli company headquartered in Or Yehuda, Israel.                Reply      bernadette phillips - 1 year ago     I am a supporter of the BDS campaign and for human rights and freedoms for the Palestinians. I am also a Manchester City supporter, which you may be aware are now becoming a global entity with a club in NYC, their support is growing worldwide. I was extremely disappointed to find out that they have recently entered into a sponsorship agreement with Wix.com an Israeli based this is a disgrace….and could – and SHOULD negatively affect the support Manchester City has around the world. I fell that if a petition was started to attempt to encourage City to withdraw from this agreement it would be internationally recognised which can only be a good thing for BDS.              Reply      Jonathan Myers - 1 year ago     Isn’t man City owned by a Qatar based family are you sure they would use an Israeli company Why are they not boycotting it              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Unfortunately BDS seems to be gaining popularity among the ordinary citizens of Qatar more than the wealthier and ruling classes (as in so many countries). See this article for recent news on BDS in Qatar: Israel-boycott movement gains traction on Gulf campuses : Gulf News And boycott WIX.com!                Reply      rose shirvani - 1 year ago     What about L’Oreal? A turn over of 25billion this year! They own lots of other brands.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Indeed, L’Oreal has long been targeted and is already listed above under cosmetics. If you’d like to write a piece on it and its brands, we welcome contributions.                Reply      Josh - 1 year ago     I am wondering whether Viber should be boycotted. I have used the service for years – but I just found out through a friend that it was founded in Israel. Recently it was taken over by Japanese but its main operations base continues to be in Israel. I am trying to avoid companies that not only do business in the occupied territories but also all of greater Israel as this is money for the continued occupation. Any thoughts about Viber and whether a switch Skype or Whats App is an alternative? Thanks              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Hi Josh, from what I can gather online it does Viber continues to have links and a development center in Israel so best find an alternative. Thanks added to the list!              Reply      Zahra - 3 days ago     What about Waze? Doesn’t it also have centers in Israel?              Reply      Rachel - 3 days ago     Waze was developed by Israelis, and then bought by Google. I suggest not to use Waze and google              Reply      ul - 1 day ago     Yes ! Their offices are on the industrial zone of an area that used to be populated with Arabs, prior to the 1948 Nakba. The area is called ‘Hirbet – Azun’ or ‘Tabsur’ as the locals’ called it. Waze should be boycotted as part of the battle with the Zionist war machine.                    Reply      bernadette phillips - 1 year ago     Please start boycott against WIX.COM – backed by the Israeli government and new website sponsors of Manchester City Football Club – manchester City Football group and it’s associated teams Manchester City New York and Manchester City Melbourne. Wix are gaining immeasurable worldwide publicity following this deal and as such will benefit greatly as will the backing given to Israel….it will also upset millions of fans worldwide…Please help get this off the ground…we need to pressure Mancehrster City              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Thank you for sharing this with us Bernadette. WIX.com has been re-added to our list (it inadvertently slipped off). Please let us know if of any BDS action against WIX.com and whether you’d like to right a short piece for the site about the company.                  Reply      David Lear - 1 year ago     JCB from the Uk need a look in too https://electronicintifada.net/blogs/adri-nieuwhof/stop-bulldozers-act-now-end-jcbs-complicity-israels-destruction-palestinian              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Thanks, added! In a report Who Profits listed JCB as one of the companies used to demolish Palestinian homes : ‘A JCB loader (model 456e ZX) and a Case loader (model 590 Super R) were used by the company during these demolitions. On its website, the company takes special pride in “a large number of complicated demolitions in villages in the Arab sector.”’                Reply      tracey - 1 year ago     should we be boycotting Nike, New Balance and Reebok – three companies that the PSC have been talking about recently?              Reply      Ladeed - 1 year ago     What we can do rather than boycotting their products in a peaceful manner?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Do not underestimate the power of BDS as peaceful grassroots movement. As Omar Barghouti was quoted as saying just today: “BDS might cost Israel in the next 10 years one percent to two percent of its GDP annually… about $28 billion to $56 billion.So, imagine that – this soft, non-violent human rights movement that’s global and led by Palestine civil society can affect Israel’s economy to the extent that we can offset the entire U.S. aid to Israel which is one of the main reasons why Israel’s regime of oppression is able to maintain its denial of Palestinian rights.” (Salon)                Reply      Ladeed - 1 year ago     Above caterpillar is listed so is it a comprehensive boycott on caterpillar. I mean they’ve shoes,jackets etc. Should we want to boycott that?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Yes. When a company is targeted for boycott they should be comprehensively boycotted so that they feel the pressure to stop supporting the apartheid practiced by Israel.                Reply      ladeed - 1 year ago     hi friends I’m from India only very few in listed above is seen in Indian market. suggest me some brands which have greater ties with Israeli government it isn’t necessary they haven’t direct link in genocide              Reply      dennis - 1 year ago     What about Iherb.com? I see the shipping address is: Worldwide Blvd, Hebron              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     No. Iherb.com is not on our list of products to boycott. I think you may have been confused by the placename. Iherb.com is based in Hebron, Kentucky, U.S.A.                Reply      Sheila - 1 year ago     Should Keter be boycotted? They are the leading manufacturer of plastic sheds and garden boxes in the UK and their products are sold by Amazon, supermarkets, Argos, etc.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Certainly do. Keter HQ are next to the Arab village ‘Ijlil al-Qibliyya’ which was depopulated in the Nakba. Keter’s money goes directly to the Zionist war machine and helps keeping the apartheid and the occupation. [this comment supplied by the user, UL… thanks to UL!]                Reply      Garrett McConnell - 1 year ago     Because of New Law signed by Gov. Cuomo, NY please look into unconstitutional law Let no one Stop this movement!              Reply      UL - 1 year ago     Should we not fly to/from Tacoma airport in Seattle? The airport just bought a system to protect the runways from debris – a system which was developed by an Israeli company called Xsight. Any tax that we pay to the airport finances the Zionist war machine.              Reply      Jack - 1 year ago     What we need is an app that we can use while shopping.. No-one can remember the entire list. Would be a simple app that would update the list automatically.. Scan the barcode and get a red or green light.. I might be able to help with this.              Reply      Heesoo - 11 months ago     Hi, Jack. I use apps Buycott and/or boycott_israel to help me grocery shop along with other shopping. The only drawback to these apps are that they are barcode scan only for the most part, so to find if specific companies have ties to Israel/Zionist movement, I search up the company barcode on google image and scan it with the app.                Reply      Sadaf Zagha - 1 year ago     Is VictoriaSecret on the BDS list as well?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Yes indeed. Victoria’s Secret, “America’s largest brand of lingerie gets its textiles from Delta Galil Industries, a company with a warehouse in the Barkan Industrial Zone, an Israeli settlement in the West Bank. It also runs stores in Ma’aleh Adumim and Pisgat Ze’ev — both in occupied territories.” This taken from Mic: 9 Brands You Can Boycott to Hold Israel Accountable for Its Violation of International Law                Reply      Maha - 1 year ago     Should we boycott Starbucks There has been many rumors about it yet Starbucks’ website denies it              Reply      admin - 11 months ago     We often encounter confusion in the BDS movement about whether McDonald’s and Starbucks are on the list. The answer from the BDS National Committee is that “Effective BDS campaigns are based on accurate research. There is a lot of information online claiming that big companies give money to Israel. Sometimes these rumours turn out to be false. For example, some campaigners call for a boycott of Starbucks. But Starbucks doesn’t have any stores in Israel and officially confirms that it does not support Israel. Companies such as McDonald’s are not priorities for the BDS movement at this stage. We focus on companies that play a clear and direct role in sustaining Israeli violations of international law and that we can have a tangible impact upon.”              Reply      simon - 6 months ago     Starbucks closed it stores its stores in Israel (after struggling with intense competition with local players). And Starbuck’s CEO Howard Schultz is well known as a big force behind America’s Zionist lobby.              Reply      admin - 6 months ago     Yes. See above for our previous response to questions about Starbucks and why it’s not on our list.                  Reply      mariam - 1 year ago     Please send me the online list.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Thank you for your interest. We don’t currently have a downloadable version of the list but as it’s an oft requested feature we should make one available. Again, we appreciate any offers of assistance in the maintenance of this site. Unlike sites supported by the Israel lobby, we do not have huge resources                 Reply      Brad Taylor - 1 year ago     You should make available bumper stickers,pins hats,t-shirts and the like. Info on petitions, etc . Stickers to go on pro solidarity products and blacklists of organizations, and companies refusing to assist .              Reply      Kathryn Hoffman - 1 year ago     Is the Motorola Company as a whole being boycotted? I just bought a smart phone I can afford, and it’s made by Motorola Company, not Motorola Solutions (which I gather is invoked in doing ‘security’ for Israel in the occupied territories). My son is a member of BDS and told me he thought the international company was begin boycotted. Please advise.              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Motorola Solutions is listed above and has long been a target of BDS for its very close ties with the Israeli military especially in regard to the supply of surveillance equipment. The Presbyterian Church (U.S.A.) successfully passed a resolution in 2014 to divest from Motorola Solutions. Motorola Mobility is a separate company (since 2011) and appears to have no direct involvement or support for the Israeli occupation so is not a target of BDS.                Reply      Muhammad Fazil - 11 months ago     Not Intel? I heard that they vacated a whole village for their production plant              Reply      admin - 11 months ago     Omar Barghouti, a confounder of the BDS movement, directly addressed the question of boycotting Intel at a meeting in Berkeley CA in 2016 and said that while Intel is a very significant contributor the coffers of the Israeli government and and has benefitted from its policies of ethnic cleansing, at this time the BDS National Committee have not made Intel a target of specific boycott campaigns from strategic reasons. He emphasized the importance of building the movement by taking on targets for which success is realistically achievable in the short term. Other groups have independently targeted Intel for its place in apartheid Israel. (Innovative Minds: Intel)              Reply      ul - 11 months ago     Which village is that? I didn’t hear about that. Please enlighten me in the recent brutal act of the Zionist invaders.                Reply      Judith Emanuel - 11 months ago     Are Shamir Optical Industry Ltd on the BDS list?              Reply      admin - 11 months ago     As an Israeli company it should certainly be boycotted, and alternative preferred, though the company is not the target of active boycott campaigns by the BDS National Committee.                Reply      Sadick Mohamed - 11 months ago     freepalestine is a nelsonmandela cause which southafricans hold dear – #apartheidisrael cannot win with their war criminal cause !              Reply      MissusH - 11 months ago     Didn’t SodaStream move their operations in response to the BDS pressure applied to their company?              Reply      admin - 11 months ago     The BDS movement successfully pressured the company to close (at least sooner than planned) its factory in an illegal settlement, but the company is still very much a target, not just because it moved to an area developed by displacing Palestinian bedouins. BDS is a comprehensive boycott of Israeli companies and companies supporting its policies, not just settlement companies.                Reply      Patricia Kiernan - 11 months ago     Joining              Reply      maein - 10 months ago     the McDonald’s is not in this list,so should we still boycott it? is there any reference which I can refer regarding McDonald’s contribution to Israel?              Reply      admin - 10 months ago     You can read this answer above: “The immediate targets of BDS for active campaigning are selected for a variety of reasons, including context sensitivity, how much they contribute to the occupation, and the possibility of success. Currently the Palestinian BDS National Committee, from whom we take our tactical cues and strategic direction, do not seem to be targeting KFC and McDonalds. This does not mean they will not be targets in the future.” You can see on this updated page of the BDS National Committee, it’s focus on targetted boycotts: BDS: What to boycott                Reply      Kelly Martin - 10 months ago     truly is this all of the list? I have a barcode scanner as well.  Is that accurate?              Reply      admin - 10 months ago     The Palestinian BDS National Committee emphasizes a targetted approach to the boycott campaign and “context sensitivity,” that is if activists in a region have good reasons to boycott a particular company they will be supported. BDS: What to boycott. Certainly avoiding any product made in Israel is a good idea to avoid providing financial support to the Israeli government and companies profiting from its apartheid policies. If any app can help with that, all the better.                Reply      kiki - 10 months ago     I just ordered Brooklinen sheets and took them out of the wash, excited to use them… and then saw the tag: “Made in Israel.” Are they are your list?              Reply      admin - 10 months ago     Definitely anything with a label that says “Made in Israel” should be boycotted. It seems Brooklinen has decided to team up with a factory in Israel and it is worth letting them know that such economic support for Israel ignores the Palestine BDS call and supports Israeli apartheid. The list is focussed on companies that have active campaigns directed towards them… Please let us know if you write an email or take further action and we’ll certainly add them to the list.                  Reply      Blumpkin - 10 months ago     I saw some food items (Deyafa Dates) at a local market and I think it should be added to the boycott. Apparently the parent company Sinokrot is based out of Jerusalem. I asked the store manager to change their date supplier and he agreed.              Reply      Billie Shannon - 9 months ago     I think that Google also should be boycotted, since they bought many Israelis companies.              Reply      Daniel A Dubay - 9 months ago     Thanks for the list. I heard Google was also complicit in Israeli apartheid. Is that true?              Reply      Stephen - 9 months ago     I didn’t see Ben and Jerry’s on the list… are they still selling ice cream in the settlements?              Reply      Collin Stewart - 8 months ago     Now is the time to go after Samsung to get out of Israel. They’re hurting from the Galaxy 7 issue. We threaten to buy Alcatel or something that isn’t connected to Israel. I have a Samsung right now and it is time to replace it.              Reply      admin - 8 months ago     Excellent idea! Reply here with any campaign ideas.                Reply      Gayle G. - 8 months ago     Nestle should also be on the list I’m pretty sure. I heard about Samsung but I also heard that maybe Apple should be on the list. Can’t buy too much that isn’t supporting Israel.               Reply      Therese - 8 months ago     I buy gluten free products for my son and there’s a company called Gratify, which makes pretzels and crackers. I had been buying them for a while and just noticed the company appears to be based in Israel. Anyone familiar? Boycott?              Reply      Peggy Casto - 8 months ago     I am boycotting Walgreens drugstore for selling unsuspecting over the counter allergy medications. On the box, Made in Israel. I did not look further…so I no longer shop at the store.              Reply      renni - 7 months ago     I just closed my airbnb account. I’m no longer host in the web.. I fully support BDS Movement.              Reply      Casa Alexander - 7 months ago     I have been boycotting for years, I know many companies have reconciled their positions in funding the war over that time,but has the list got even smaller by 2016?              Reply      Sarwar - 5 months ago     I have started boycotting Israeli products as well as other products (who somehow support Israeli occupation in the Palestinian territories).I am used to spread this movement among the people here in Bangladesh.But hardly they take it seriously. So I wanna run this movement here in Bangladesh and wanna arrange BDS flash mob,Rap/street music,Stunt show to Boost up the BDS movement.That’s why I need to run a facebook group & page.In this regard I want to ensure you that I will not break any government rule.Do you have any problem if I do so?..What is your opinion?              Reply      admin - 5 months ago     Brilliant! So glad to hear you are planning such actions as a BDS flash mob, Rap/street music, or Stunt show. I strongly encourage you to get organizing, by doing something like setting up social media pages, so people can learn more about the movement. Campaigns and actions like your suggesting are far more important than individuals just saying they say support the consumer boycott. Carefully targeted boycott campaigns that can boost public awareness and show public support through their success are the heartbeat of BDS. This site like all BDS activists take ultimate guidance from the Palestinian BDS National Committee. They are very aware of the importance of “context sensitivity,” and know that people in activists in Bangladesh will be best at determining local campaigns and targets that have the best chances of success. Please check out their site for more guidance and info (bdsmovement.net : GET INVOLVED Ideas for Action)… and get back in touch if you have further questions or news of your campaigns. In solidarity!                Reply      Tarin - 5 months ago     what are the companies/products in blue? thanks              Reply      Faisal - 5 months ago     What about TV shows with Jewish or Israeli actors? Shouldn’t we add those to the list and hurt any TV series that would dare cast one of them?              Reply      admin - 4 months ago     TV shows that accept funding from the Israeli government are certainly targets of BDS. A campaign against the series ‘Dig’ bought by USA Network successfully drew attention to the way tv shows can be used to promote Israel’s “military occupation and illegal colonization.” Religion is always irrelevant to the selection of targets and campaigning by BDS. What matters is involvement and support with Israel and its violations of international law and Palestinians’ human rights. As Bassem Tamimi recently said, Netanyahu could convert to Islam tomorrow and the boycott would remain in place. Please let us know of any tv show you feel is serving Israeli propaganda purposes and would be a suitable target for campaigning.                Reply      admin - 4 months ago     The companies in blue have an article on this website explaining why they should be boycotted. We’re always looking for new contributors and would like to turn a lot more on the list blue. Please contact us if you’d like to write a little piece.                Reply      John Dou - 5 months ago     I would like to ask about Medjool dates grown in California U.S.A. There are several Israeli growers but I do not have information about brands. Any information about which U.S grown Medjool dates are supportive of Israeli terrorism?              Reply      admin - 4 months ago     Excellent question. Here’s our page about Israeli Dates. Lots of lovely juicy Medjool dates are available in California, usually proudly labelled. We’re not aware of any agricultural company growing dates that is supportive of Israeli violations of international law, so please let us know if you find anything. We were recently alerted about Israeli dates being distributed by WH Smith by Osem Ltd in the UK. It is vital to check the label.                Reply      Nieza - 4 months ago     Is MCD included in the list? I need some clarification. Thank you.              Reply      Amr - 4 months ago     Should we boycott WhatApp? The owner spoke against BDS.              Reply      nasr - 4 months ago     Boycott INTEL, buy only PC’s with AMD processors!  INTEL CORPORATION has a large manufacturing facility in Kiryat Gat, built on the ruins of an Arab Village taken by Israel from its inhabitants after the 1949 armistice agreement and in violation of that agreement. Many of the owners of this land live as refugees awaiting the return assured them in UN Resolution 194. Isn’t this on the list?              Reply      Rafin S Fastur - 3 months ago     How can I as a tourist visit the Holy Land sites and still be a supporter of “Boycott, Divestiture, Sanctions”? When I boycott Israel’s economic, banking, commercial, military, academic, cultural and tourism activities, I do not want to end up hurting the rights and income of the Palestinian people.              Reply      UL - 3 months ago     you can’t ! Don’t go to holy land                Reply      Willie - 3 months ago     Can you make this downloadable on google docs or as a pdf or something? I think this would be an excellent list to be able to spread around more and add to, depending of the needs of different organizations.                Reply      NotifyingGal - 3 months ago     The chic, expensive greeting card company Papyrus sells greeting cards made in Israel              Reply      Jeff monson - 3 months ago     Add Sabra hummus to this list              Reply      emily - 2 months ago     Avgol nonwovens is a company that makes textiles for hygienic products such as diapers and feminine products. they operate a plant in the barkan industrial complex, in the west bank. Procter and Gamble, Kimberly-Clark, and Pampers are all customers of Avgol and get many of their product’s material from Avgol https://whoprofits.org/company/avgol-nonwoven-industries even if you dont list procter and gamble, you should list Avgol nonwovens.              Reply      Zahra - 1 month ago     Are Nestle, Procter & Gamble, Kimberly-Clark, or Estee Lauder still currently the target of boycotts?              Reply      Ras - 4 weeks ago     can you tell which supports palestine?              Reply      Bonnie Arnold - 4 weeks ago     What banks are involved in BDS?              Reply      J D Ansari - 1 week ago     It’s good idea              Reply      Radwa - 1 day ago     What about H&M?        Pings & Trackbacks   Canadian government attempts to end free speech and silence this list | The Fifth Column  Moroccanoil — Israeli hair products that glamorize apartheid  VERSA | Sparkling NUS makes brave stand against Zionism in our soft-drinks  Boycott On Aisle Three: Avoid These 6 Products That Support Israeli Apartheid – Kit O’Connell/Mintpress | Plato's Guns  Boycott On Aisle Three: Avoid These 6 Products That Support Israeli Apartheid  BDS (Boycott, Divestments, Sanctions) is Free Speech | billziegler1947  Students at University of Minnesota launch divest campaign - Palestine in America  BDS LIST BOYCOTT THESE PRODUCTS AND COMPANIES | circusbuoy                Follow @BDSlist                                                                                                                                                                                                                    Sabra Dipping Co, LLC - BDS list                                                        Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                  Sabra Dipping Co, LLC    A report by BDSlist.org Specialising in dips popular in the Mediterranean region, the Sabra Company is now owned by two independent, global food companies – PepsiCo, based in the US, and Strauss Group, based in Israel. (For Strauss Group’s other brands, see here.) The term “sabra” is Israeli slang for a Jewish person born in historical Palestine.  The term “sabra” also refers to an extensively upgraded M60 Patton military tank developed by Israel Military Industries.  The company is a subsidiary of Blue & White Foods, LLC, whose name refers to the colours of the Israeli flag.  Background:  1986 Israeli born Zohar Norman founded Sabra in New York with the Israeli Yanko family, who at the time owned the Tzabar (Hebrew form of ‘sabra’) brand of packaged salads and spreads sold in Israel 1992 Norman bought out Yanko partner 1994 Rabbi Yehuda Pearl, owner of Blue & White Foods, LLC, distributor of Israeli food in the US, bought a 50% stake in Sabra (nb this is NOT Judea/Yehuda Pearl, the father of murdered journalist Daniel Pearl) 2002 Pearl bought out Norman 2005 Major share (51%) bought by Strauss Group; Pearl maintained 49% 2008 Strauss formed joint-venture partnership with PepsiCo; Pearl remains Partner and Chairman of the Board of Blue & White Foods, LLC and its subsidiary Sabra  Perhaps in the spirit of the original founding member of Strauss being a member of the infamous Haganah militia, Strauss Group boasts of its support of the Israeli military, specifically the two brigades notorious for human rights abuses: Golani and Givati.  Until late 2010, Strauss Group stated on its website: “Our connection with soldiers goes as far back as the country, and even further.  We see a mission and need to continue to provide our soldiers with support, to enhance their quality of life and service conditions, and sweeten their special moments.  We have adopted the Golani reconnaissance platoon for over 30 years and provide them with an ongoing variety of food products for their training or missions, and provide personal care packages for each soldier that completes the path.  We have also adopted the Southern Shualei Shimshon troops from the Givati platoon with the goal of improving their service conditions and being there at the front to spoil them with our best products.” Under pressure from BDS activists, Strauss Group removed this statement from its website, to replace it with a description whose concern seems more social than military: “As part of its donations program, the Sales Division of Strauss Israel has made a contribution to the men and women who serve in the Golani brigade.  The funds are designated for welfare, cultural and educational activities, such as pocket money for underprivileged soldiers, sports and recreational equipment, care packages, and books and games for the soldiers’ club.  Yotvata, our dairy in the south, contributes likewise to the southern Shualei Shimshon unit.” This move was clearly cosmetic camouflage, however, as its chairperson, Ofra Strauss, subsequently conceded that Strauss Group continued to provide food to soldiers during training and on missions, while noting “For us, Israeli soldiers are not army; Israeli soldiers are our kids.”  Strauss sits on the Advisory Board of the Foundation for Former Lone Soldiers (HESEG), an organisation that pays non-Israelis to serve in the Israeli military forces.  She is also an Executive Member of the Board of Governors of The Jewish Agency, a Zionist public relations organisation that recruits and financially supports new citizens and soldiers for an exclusively Jewish Israel. There is little doubt, then, that Strauss Group actively supports this vision of a militarised Zionist enclave.  Yet as a successful business, it recognises the importance of selling an image.  Today you will not find a mention of Strauss Group’s military support.  Instead, you will find the new marketing image, focusing on its support of youth groups, needy families, and female professionals.  Showing a smiling, semi-veiled woman, it even highlights a programme called “Partnering with Jasmine,” which is “designed to promote Jewish and Arab businesswomen who run small businesses.”  This guise of equitability is rather at odds with the stance of Ofra Strauss’s endeavours at The Jewish Agency. . . leading us to suspect that this “play fair” image is merely a typical illusion crafted to suit “Brand Israel.” Nonetheless, Sabra’s Israeli born CEO, Ronen Zohar, has dismissed BDS efforts, saying “The protesters make noise, but they make noise to themselves.  It doesn’t have any influence on our business.”  Sure, both Strauss Group and Sabra still make a fortune in profits.  But being in the BDS spotlight has prompted them to downplay their roots in aggressive Zionism.  Not only has Strauss rewritten its “community involvement,” for instance, but Sabra’s recent publication “Hummus for Dummies” describes Sabra as “an American company,” failing to mention its relation with the Israeli Strauss Group.  In fact, Sabra’s website describes its seemingly wholesome history as being founded “in 1986 in Queens New York as Sabra Blue & White Foods” with the “simple mission of bringing the healthy and delicious cuisine of the Mediterranean to people’s everyday diets.”  New York.  The Mediterranean.  Not Israel.  And not exactly that simple.  Despite very deep Israeli roots, the Sabra website only mentions Israel once, noting the Strauss Group happens to be headquartered there. The value of boycotting Sabra products lies in its power to hold Israeli companies accountable for Israel’s egregious violations of human rights and international law.  Sabra is just one element of a massive food products corporation.  No matter how strong, a boycott of Sabra will barely make a dent in the corporate profits.  But that is not the point.  The goal of singling out particular products such as Sabra Hummus is to force public scrutiny of Zionist Israel.  The ongoing boycott has already prompted the company to mask its identity.  That begs the question of why that identity has become so troublesome.          3 years ago   Consumer                Tweet                         Join the conversation  Cancel Reply        Notify me of follow-up comments by email. Notify me of new posts by email.              Reply      jack - 1 year ago     I don’t get it. You say that Sabra is owned by Pepsico. If Pepsico owns Sabra why not boycott all Pepsico products?              Reply      admin - 1 year ago     Excellent question Jack. The answer has two parts, both of which derive from principles outlined by the founders of the movement and can be learned about on the site bdsmovement.com 1: Strategic effectiveness: targets of BDS must be chosen with an eye for realistic and effective success in its broader campaign. Sabra has a clear and direct link to supporting the occupation, all the more so since a controlling interest was bought by the pro-Zionist Strauss group in 2005. 2: Context sensitivity : “BDS is not a dogmatic or centralized movement—it is all about context sensitivity and creativity. BDS supporters in any particular context decide what to target and how to mobilize and organize their local campaigns.” Pepsico should certainly be pressured to cut all contact with Sabra and any company involved in the occupation but currently students are focussing energies on keeping Sabra of college kitchens and ordinary shoppers are campaigning outside shops to keep Sabra out of our refrigerators.          Pings & Trackbacks   Thúc đẩy Israel ngừng phân biệt chủng tộc – Tẩy chay các sản phẩm và công ty sản xuất ← Sĩ Quan Trừ Bi XV  BDS LIST BOYCOTT THESE PRODUCTS AND COMPANIES | circusbuoy                Follow @BDSlist                                          Why? - BDS list                                                      Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                  Why?   Why should you boycott Israel? By refusing to buy the goods listed on this site, you will avoid supporting the oppression of Palestinians and pressure the Israeli government into obeying international laws. Why did this campaign start? In 2005, over 171 Palestinian unions and other civic groups issued a unified call for help to the international community, a call for Boycott Divestment and Sanctions (BDS). It was a year after the separation wall had been ruled illegal by the UN, and Israel continued to violate this and countless other UN resolutions, Geneva conventions and other international laws without consequences or any sign of progress via diplomacy and political negotiations. Palestinian people were continuing to see their lands stolen by settlements, their economy throttled by a blockade, the daily humiliations of checkpoints, and severe limitations on the basics of human life and dignity, like water, electricity and education, all this under a brutal security regime permitting IDF soldiers and Israeli settlers to harass and kill Palestinians with near impunity. Drawing inspiration from Nelson Mandela and the international boycott that led to the end of apartheid in South Africa, the Occupied Palestine and Golan Heights Advocacy Initiative (OPGAI) formulated a strategy that could be shared around the world. The call for Boycott divestment and Sanctions was able to gain wide acceptance among Palestinians and gains ever-growing international support, including Jewish and Israeli groups, through its emphasis on non-violence and the core issues of Israel’s violations of international law and human rights. Why does it work? The economic pressure and the power of public opinion that is generated by a wide-scale international boycott is immense. F.W. de Klerk wrote that the boycott, disinvestment and sanctions campaign against apartheid South Africa led to a 1.5% decline in national economic growth. This impact was not only from people avoiding South African goods but from a changed psychology that compelled companies, organizations and governments to avoid doing business with South Africa’s apartheid government. As the BDS campaign, like the campaign against “blood diamonds”, makes enough people aware of Israel’s human rights abuses, governments and organizations are compelled to act. Why does Israel get called apartheid? Israeli policy regards Arab people as a demographic threat much as the Afrikaners regarded native Africans. Arabs in Israel suffer discrimination across all aspects of life. Over 50 laws clearly segregate Arab people as second citizens, including severely restricting where they can buy or rent property, their political rights, and access to fair judicial process. Israel operates separate education systems and allocates about $192 per year on each Arab student compared to $1,100 per Jewish student. The Legal Center for Arab and Minority Rights in Israel has an informative list of the Discriminatory Laws in Israel. For Palestinians living in Gaza or the West Bank the discrimination is even more severe and life is far harder than for their Israeli neighbors living in well-subsidized settlements built on the illegally annexed villages and farmlands. These 4 million Palestinians do not have Israeli citizenship and so cannot vote in Israeli elections. They are subject to military justice which commonly detains Palestinians without evidence or charge for months or years, even if you are a child, and regular reports of torture.  Daily life is subject to countless humiliations. Cars are required to have special licence plates and are forbidden from driving on the well-maintained highways used by settlers only. Palestinians attempting a trip to the shop or hospital are commonly delayed for hours by about 99 permanent checkpoints and 100s more temporary ones, where the whim of soldiers has complete power. Over 50 Palestinian children have been born at checkpoints. Like in the South African pass system, Palestinians require a permit for any trip and these permits are often delayed or not awarded for no apparent reason. Hate crimes and malicious destruction of property by settlers is almost never investigated or punished. Palestinians in the Gaza and the West Bank are treated with disdain by the occupying force. After John Kerry has said Israel risked becoming an “apartheid state.”  Archbishop Desmond Tutu is among many South African individuals and civic groups that have declared support for BDS I go and I visit the Holy Land and I see things that are a mirror image of the sort of things that I experienced under the apartheid Apartheid is clearly a contentious term that meets with strong objection from the powerful Israel-lobby, the network of organizations supporting Israel’s current policies. But understanding and communicating the apartheid structure in Israeli laws and policies helps people understand the injustice occurring in Israel and motivates them to do something about it. Why not boycott other countries with objectionable behavior? A boycott against a state is a strategy to achieve real political change, not just a personal commentary on something you object to. The oppressed Palestinian population has called for this boycott and its impact is already clear. There are not many other serious calls from populations to boycott the country they live in (China is one), and individuals must make the decision whether a boycott would be an effective strategy to change a particular injustice.             Join the conversation  Cancel Reply        Notify me of follow-up comments by email. Notify me of new posts by email.                Reply      Blake Alcott - 3 years ago     You are doing a good service by providing the names of these companies. I hope you expand the list. I support boycott of all Israeli goods, boycott of goods of companies doing business in Israel (not just the West Bank), and divestment from all such companies and all Israelie companies. However, I have three objections. (1) You do not mention Palestinians in the diaspora (shatat), commonly called refugees and their descendants, with a single word. This is a grave oversight. (2) You do mention apartheid within ‘Israel’ against Palestinians, and hats off for this, although you should perhaps give the link to Adalah’s database of the over Israeli 50 apartheid laws: https://www.adalah.org/en/content/view/7771. But Palestinians within Israel and those in exile receive from you less attention than you give to Palestinians in the West Bank and Gaza, and in my opinion this is not only wrong in principle but less likely to succeed than a blanket boycott aimed at Israel as such, with no qualifications and complications involving ‘West Bank settlements’ and such. (3) Of the six companies/organisations you highlight in some detail, fully five of them are targeted because of their activities in the West Bank: Ahava, G4S, Sodastream, Ariel University and Jordan River dates; Sabra food products is the only company targeted because of its connection to Israel in general. Your ‘full list’ contains 110 companies/organisations (if Ariel U is included), and about 30 of them have asterisks by their names, indicating the ‘profit directly’ from activity in the illegal Jewish West Bank settlements. There is no point in distinguishing between these companies and the others. The cause of the plight of all three groups of Palestinians that we can divide according to where they live – exile, ‘Israel’ and WBG – is… Israel. Therefore nothing less than a full boycott of all things Israeli makes sense. The South African boycott was built on this model of full boycott of the guilty country, but you are making false distinctions between injustice to WBG Palestinians and the others, making things moreover more complicated. Israel is ‘occupying’ all of historic Palestine. Your emphasis on just the West Bank makes the other Palestinians less visible – for instance, your own website does not see the shatat Palestinians! Dividing Palestinians into the three goups is part of the divide-and-conquer strategy in the first place, and you should not play along with that one bit. I hope you continue your good work but expand your philosophy to one of a simple principle – Boycott Israel. Thank you.              Reply      admin - 3 years ago     Thank you very much for your thoughtful response Blake Alcott. This “Why?” section is still being completed and your comments will help guide its development (the link to that excellent resource has been added above, cheers). And certainly the list of products and companies itself has only just begun. As the site’s name suggests, the mission of the site is to be a resource for BDS supporters and potential supporters seeking a list of companies to boycott. Making this list and keeping up with BDS successes and news is our immediate intention. We do not intend a comprehensive survey of the injustices Israel perpetrates towards Palestinians, as there are better resources out there for that big job. That said, statements on this page should make perfectly clear that BDS supports the Right of Return of Palestinians in the diaspora. Given the aims of BDS to pressure the Israeli government to change its unjust laws and practices, a blanket boycott and divestment of Israeli companies, including a cultural boycott and an academic boycott, will clearly have the greatest impact. The Israeli government will not feel the world’s anger as forcefully if there is selective boycott of settlement companies only. The site’s current emphasis on these settlement companies came about as these companies are the low-lying fruit – they are clear and obnoxious products of Israeli illegality and are helping create a consensus of people around the globe who want to boycott an Israel that produces them. The fact that 17 EU countries recently stated that business in settlements is bad business seems to suggest governments are adopting BDS tactics. We do not promote any particular one or two-state solution, that is for Palestinians and Israelis to decide when Palestinians are equal partners in the negotiations. We promote equality and justice for Palestinians wherever they are.                Reply      Blake Alcott - 3 years ago     And thank you, Admin, for your reply to my comment, and for including the link to Adalah’s list of discriminatoryIsraeli laws. If you’ll pardon my persistence, I’d like to bring up the ‘refugees’ again, those 5 million + outside of historic Palestine who have the right to return and the right to ownership of their property in Israel. In most Palestine solidarity organisations they are an afterthought, yet the collapse of Zionism follows recognition of their rights just as day follows night. Perhaps obviously, I support the One Democratic State solution, which I think is the only solution consistent with BDS’s 3 demands (see the 2005 Call); were these demands fulfilled, boycott and divestment could be called off and, de facto, there would be one state with equal rights for all. (Or, absurdly, there could be Two Democratic States, which would merge.) For me all two-state solutions are just that: a solution with two states – and one of them is the ethnocratic apartheid Zionist state that denies Right of Return, known as Israel. On the basis of universal values, in my opinion, all such racist states should be opposed, and therefore by a process of elimination I can’t support any two-state solution. So, to wind this up: I disagree that outsiders (neither Palestinian nor Jewish Israeli) must stay on the fence on the one-state/two/state issue. As long as one Palestinian supports One Democratic State, I will support that Palestinian. You write of this issue that “that is for Palestinians and Israelis to decide.” But solidarity people don’t DECIDE anything. Nobody even has to listen to our arguments for ODS. Moreover there is no mechanism to find out what ‘the Palestinians’ want because nobody polls all of them. Supporting ODS is fully consistent with what you write, and it means simply the end of any ethnically-defined state in historic Palestine. This is why I hope BDS (I don’t know your relationship with BDS itself) re-orients its strategy towards a blanket boycott of all things Israeli. And again, thank you for your work in putting together a good long list.              Reply      Janice - 1 year ago     The United Methodist Women had a mission study on Israel/Palestine several year ago. That is where I learned about http://www.annainthemiddleeast.com/ and noticed that news about Israel gets on the first page most often here, but news about Palestinians you will find most often on page 13, and it is always about rock throwing,                   Follow @BDSlist                                              Israeli dates - BDS list                                                         Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                       Israeli dates   Nearly half of the illegal settlements in the Jordan Valley grow dates and it’s their most profitable crop contributing significantly to their economic viability. That profitability involves illegal underpayment of Palestinian workers, exploitation of child labor and dispossession of Palestinian farmers from their land. Boycotting Israeli dates is one of the most direct ways to target illegal settlements. Exports of dates earn Israel $265 million a year. About 60% comes from illegal settlement plantations and packaging facilities, mainly in the Jordan valley but also in the Dead Sea area. Hadiklaim, the Israeli Date Growers Cooperative, is the major producer, selling under these brands throughout Europe and the US: Jordan River Jordan River Bio-Top for bio-organic dates King Solomon But most importantly CHECK THE LABEL! Supermarkets often stock Israeli dates under their own name (in the UK this includes this includes Marks & Spencer, Sainsbury’s, Tesco, Asda and Waitrose). There has been also been a very worrying practice of mislabeling dates as Product of Israel when they’ve been either grown or processed in settlements. Sometimes they are labelled “produced in the West Bank.” These are not Palestinian dates. Child exploitation and illegal labor practices A 2006 investigative report by Israeli newspaper Haaretz exposed many of these unfair labor practices, which include leaving workers, including children, on the tops of date palm trees in the grueling sun for up to nine hours, in some cases, at a stretch with no breaks. Palestinian workers are paid less than their Israeli counterparts, in violation of Israeli law. – See more at: http://www.bdsmovement.net/2012/ramadan-israel-dates-boycott-campaign-launched-in-us-9311#sthash.xbrH1cXB.dpuf Palestinian Central Bureau of Statistics found that more than 7,000 children between 5 and 17 years of age were working in the Jordan Valley alone – See more at: http://www.bdsmovement.net/2012/ramadan-israel-dates-boycott-campaign-launched-in-us-9311#sthash.xbrH1cXB.dpuf There are good alternatives Buying medjool dates from Yaffa will actually support a Palestinian company. Tunisia, Morocco, Saudi Arabia and Iran are other big producers. For US consumers there are many medjool date producers in California, which will also help you reduce your carbon footprint. #BDS win Agrexco was the flagship state-supported company in charge of  Israeli exports of dates and other produce. The BDS has been acknowledged as a contributing factor to its collapse in 2011 http://www.bdsmovement.net/2011/international-bidders-agrexco-7840 In 2012 the UK’s coop Group A spokesperson for the Palestinian Union of Agricultural Work Committees, which works to improve the conditions of Palestinian agricultural communities, said: “Israeli agricultural export companies like Mehadrin profit from and are directly involved in the ongoing colonisation of occupied Palestinian land and theft of our water. Trade with such companies constitutes a major form of support for Israel’s apartheid regime over the Palestinian people, so we warmly welcome this principled decision by the Co-operative. The movement for boycotts, divestment and sanctions (BDS) against Israel until it complies with international law is proving to be a truly effective form of action in support of Palestinian rights.” http://www.theguardian.com/world/2012/apr/29/co-op-israel-west-bank-boycott On the 28th of January 2013 another major BDS victory was announced when BDS Movement South Africa and Palestine Solidarity Alliance issued a press statement announcing that Karsten Farms, a leading South African agricultural company, has severed its trade relations with Hadiklaim. Campaigners have been trying to persuade Karsten to end its relationship with the Israeli cooperative for the last three year http://corporateoccupation.org/mislabelled-morrisons-own-brand-packaging-found-in-illegal-israeli-settlement-tomer/ http://www.inminds.com/boycott-israeli-dates.php Action On Friday 6 June 2014, Friends of Al Aqsa in the UK will be holding their 5th annual Check the Label – Boycott Israeli Dates campaign. You can support the action via twitter. More details and campaign materials available here: http://www.foa.org.uk/campaigns/check-the-label       3 years ago   Consumer         ← G4S Ahava beauty products →          Join the conversation  Cancel Reply        Notify me of follow-up comments by email. Notify me of new posts by email.      Pings & Trackbacks   Boycott On Aisle Three: Avoid These 6 Products That Support Israeli Apartheid – Kit O’Connell/Mintpress | Plato's Guns  Do You Know Where Your Ramadan Dates Come From? - Chicago Monitor                Follow @BDSlist                                      Elbit Systems - BDS list                                                         Home Why? Contact                      BDS list    Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid     Home Why? Contact        Type & hit enter to search   Follow Us                           BDS list     Boycott these products and companies to stop Israeli apartheid      Home Why? Contact                                  Elbit Systems   Founded in 1967, the Israeli company Elbit Systems has become one of the world’s premiere “security and defence,” firms, specializing in military electronics, surveillance systems, Unmanned Air Vehicles (UAVs or “drones”), and security systems. It is a symbol for the Israeli economy, which essentially thrives on and fuels war, repression and control in Palestine and around the globe.  Elbit Systems is built on the expertise of the Israeli Ministry of Defense Research Institute and has profited greatly from supplying the Israeli military with a variety of equipment used to sustain Israeli occupation of the Palestinian people. It produces the drones used in the wars and attacks against Gaza and Lebanon and provides equipment for the Israeli Merkava tanks. The Israeli Apartheid Wall, which is crippling Palestinian communities by isolating them in walled-in ghettos, has provided a massive source of revenue for Elbit. Elbit Systems provides “intrusion detection systems” for the Wall, in particular around Jerusalem. Subsidiaries Elbit Electro-Optics (El-Op) and Elbit Security Systems supplied and incorporated LORROS surveillance cameras in the Ariel settlement section as well as around Ar Ram. One product made by Elbit Systems, “Torch”, is manufactured specifically for use on the Wall. Elbit offers its experience in ghettoizing and killing Palestinians to repress other people. In 2006 its American subsidiary Kollsman Inc. won a contract to participate in the creation of the US – Mexico border wall, dubbed by activists the ‘Wall of Death’. On June 9th 2004, the International Court of Justice ruling on the legal consequences of the Wall not only confirmed the illegality of the Wall under international law, but also insisted that all state parties to the Fourth Geneva Convention are obligated “to ensure compliance by Israel with international humanitarian law” and thus “not render any aid or assistance in maintaining the situation created by [the construction of the Wall]”. Thus, actors who aid Israel in the construction of the Wall are, by association, in breach of international law, including, as the ICJ ruling highlights, the United Nations Charter, international humanitarian law and human rights law. Many international financial institutions and pension funds have additional ethical guidelines or are part of international human rights frameworks, such as the UN Global Compact, which include provisions against complicity with human rights violations and war crimes. Because Elbit Systems is knowingly participating in and aiding Israeli war crimes and Israeli occupation of the Palestinian people, investors in and partners of the security firm are, by extension, accessories to Israel’s many violations of international law and human rights standards. Grassroots movements and campaigners have raised awareness of this relationship and several pension funds and financial institutions have pulled their investments from Elbit. The world is becoming increasingly unwilling to bankroll Israeli war crimes. Campaign successes Since the launch of the BDS campaign in 2005 on the first anniversary of the ICJ ruling against the Wall, the BDS movement has made huge strides in raising awareness about the central role international support plays in sustaining Israeli apartheid. The campaign against Elbit Systems has had numerous successes and has become a key pillar of the BDS movement. In May 2010, Deutsche Bank, Germany’s biggest bank, announced it was ‘out of Elbit’ and confirmed exclusion of the company from its portfolio because it does not meet Deutsche Bank’s ethical standards. Deutsche Bank was previously listed among the top ten investors in the corporation. Scandinavian countries have been leading the divestment movement. On March 29th, 2010, the administrators of Sweden’s national pension funds announced that they were excluding Elbit Systems from their investment portfolios. The Swedish AP funds, which manage assets of more than 800 billion kroner ($110 bn) in the state pension system, fully divested from the corporation. According to AP’s Ethical Council, Elbit was excluded because it “can be linked to violations of fundamental conventions and norms through its active development, delivery and maintenance of a custom-made monitoring system for certain parts of the separation barrier being built in the West Bank.” Shares in Elbit fell by 3 percent in the days that immediately followed the Swedish announcement. Curiously, Israel’s response to the Swedish funds was surprisingly weak, only stating that it was a “regrettable” decision. This muted reaction suggests that Israel is struggling to find an effective way to counter the BDS movement’s rapidly growing momentum. AP’s refusal to be complicit in Israel’s human rights abuses follows a trend started by Norway in 2009 when the Norwegian Finance Minister announced that the state pension fund was to become the first major fund to divest from Elbit because of its connections to violations of human rights and international law.     A timeline of Bust Elbit successes: * September 2009: Norwegian State Pension Fund divests. * September 2009: Kommunal Landspensjonkasse (KLP), one of the largest life insurance companies in Norway divests from Elbit * January 2010: Danske Bank, the largest bank in Denmark and a leading player in the Scandinavian financial markets, divests, making it one of only 24 companies from which the Danish bank has divested. Thomas H. Kjaergaard, the staff member responsible for socially responsible investment at Danske Bank states: “We handle clients’ interests, and we do not want to put customers’ money in companies that violate international standards.”  January 2010: Danwatch, the Danish financial watchdog adds Elbit to its blacklist of 35 companies that are disqualified from investments due to ethical considerations. January 2010: PKA Ltd., one of the largest Danish pension funds, sells shares in Elbit worth 1 million dollars. The PKA’s investment director, Michael Nelleman tells the Stop the Wall campaign that “the International Court of Justice stated that the barrier only serves military purposes and violates Palestinian human rights.” February 2010: Folksam, Sweden’s largest asset manager, responds to an inquiry regarding its investments in either Elbit or Africa-Israel, that the fund did not have holdings in either company. Folksam’s Head of Corporate Governance, Carina Lundberg Markow, writes to The Electronic Intifada: “We have a strict policy regarding activity on occupied land.” She notes that KPA Pension, a leading Swedish pension company in the public sector, also did not have holdings with either Elbit or Africa-Israel. February 2010: ABP sells Elbit shares worth 2.7 million dollars. March 2010: The First, Second, Third and Fourth Swedish National Pension Fund (AP1, AP2, AP3 and AP4) decide to exclude Elbit Systems from their investments. May 2010: Deutsche Bank announces the exclusion of Elbit from its investments. 2013: RMIT University in Melbourne, Australia, launched a campaign against both BAE and ELbit Systems. The university receives funding, performing postgraduate research. 2013: Grassroots International launched a campaign against TIAA-CREF to divest from Elbit Systems, as part of a broader worldwide effort against large pension funds and banks. April 2014: graduate students at the University of New Mexcio in Albuqeurque, United States, passed a resolution calling for divestment from the companies profiting from human rights violations in occupied Palestine and at the US-Mexico border. The resolution specically targeted Elbit Systems following the company securing a contract with the US government to further militarise the US-Mexico border wall. May 2014: As a result of Elbit’s contract with the government of Rio Grande do Sul, Brazil, to build a military microsatellite, protesters blocked the office of Elbit’s subsidiary AEL Sistemas. The protest aimed at putting pressure on both local government and university to divest from Elbit. January 2016: “Campaigners in France are welcoming a decision by their country’s military not to buy the Watchkeeper drone, which is based on a model Israel has used in hundreds of lethal attacks on Palestinian civilians… More than 8,000 people had signed a petition launched by BDS France in September calling on the defense ministry not to pick the Israeli drone.” (In surprise move, France rejects Israeli drones : Electronic Intifada)  Join the DIVEST ELBIT Campaign The following points, drawn from the victories in the campaign to divest from Elbit as well as other important BDS victories against Lev Leviev and companies Veolia and Alstom, may be helpful when choosing a company to target for divestment. 1. The first step is: Discovering investments in, cooperation with and other support to Elbit. Several key forms of involvement with Elbit are likely to be targets of your campaign: a) Investments of banks or pension funds in the company The biggest institutional investors in Elbit can be found at: Elbit Systems Ltd. Ownership Summary : Nasdaq Many other smaller investors are not listed. It will be up to you to investigate whether a specific pension or investment fund holds investments in Elbit. Banks and public funds, universities, unions and churches have often an obligation to disclose their investments. Nasdaq.com by now lists only seven institutional investors outside the US and Canada (May 2011 – please check the site for the most recent list of investors): • KBC Group NV, Havenlaan 2, Brussels, 1080, 32 78 152 154 • Credit Suisse AG, Po Box 900, Zurich, CH 8070, 41 1 212 16 16 • UBS AG, Bahnhofstrasse 45, Zurich, – 41-1-234-4100 • Credit Suisse, Uetlibergstrasse 231, Zurich, 8070, 0041 1 333 1227 • Dekabank Deutsche Girozentrale, Mainzer Landstrabe 16, Frankfurt,60325, 49.69.7147-0 • Barclays Global Investors UK Holdings Ltd, 1 Churchill Place, London, E14 5hp,             415 908 7765 • Mitsubishi UFJ Trust & Banking Corp, 1-4-5 Marunouchi Chiyoda-Ku, Tokyo, 100-8212, 81-3-3212-1211 b) Contracts (mainly public) for Elbit It is not easy to find out about contracts in the field of arms trade and homeland security – especially not before they are awared. Elbit lists some of its contracts on its site:http://ir.elbitsystems.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=61849&p=irol-news&nyo=0. Other contracts may be locally or nationally publicized. Even if the campaign is not strong enough to reverse done deals, a sustained effort can well stop any renewal of contracts. Example: Stop Australian Defence contracts with Elbit! On March 15 2010, the Israeli financial newspaper Globes announced that Elbit Systems Ltd had won a $298 million (AU$331 million) Australia department of defense contract for a command and control system for the Australian Army. Globes quotes CEO Joseph Ackerman said, “Australia is a very important market for Elbit Systems, and we are extremely proud to be selected by the department of defense for this major program, one of the largest and most prestigious BMS programs in the world.http://www.globes.co.il/serveen/globes/docview.asp?did=1000546727&fid=942 c) Funding and cooperation in research and development (R&D) projects Elbit Systems receives millions of dollars in research and development funding from government and third sector research programs that are financed with public tax money. This funding often contravenes rules prohibiting the use of such programs to fund military research. Details of such funding are usually made public, offering ample space for grassroots campaigns. Example: Stop EU funding for Elbit! In  2007, Israel became associated into the EU’s Seventh Research Framework Programme (FP7) 2007-2013, under the EU Agreement on Scientific and Technological cooperation and, as a result, Elbit qualifies to apply for EU funding. Elbit currently participates in research projects worth €14.19m, including taking the lead on a €8.99m project. d) Investments, cooperation and contracts to Elbit subsidiaries: Elbit has a range of subsidiaries, including Elbit Systems of America, Vision Systems International LLC (VSI), Elop, ESLC-T, Elisra, Cyclone Ltd, Elbit Security Systems Ltd. (ELSEC), Kinetics Ltd, Semi-Conductor Devices (SCD), Optronics Industries Ltd. (Opgal), UAV Tactical Systems Ltd. (U-TacS). Campaign against the contracts and investment in these subsidiaries! Example: Stop UK tax money boosting Elbit profits! On April 15 2010, Reuters announced that the UAS Tactical Systems Ltd (U-TacS) won a $70 million contract with Thales UK to provide logistics support services for the UK armed forces Watchkeeper project over the next three years. U-TacS is owned by Elbit Systems. (http://in.reuters.com/article/idINTRE63E10B20100415) e) Joint ventures and joint project with Elbit International companies partner up with Elbit to make joint bids for big tenders or to develop new technology. Campaigns can target international companies and pressure them to look for different partners. Example: Stop German complicity with the Israeli war crimes and the Apartheid Wall! On July 19 2010, Globes announced that Elbit Systems and Grob Aircraft AG are to Partner in the Development of the G-120TP Family of Trainers Combining Grob’s extensive aircraft design experience and Elbit Systems’ advanced avionics capabilities and leadership in the global training market Defense electronics company Elbit Systems Ltd. (http://www.globes.co.il/serveen/globes/docview.asp?did=1000575797) 2. Some useful things to think about when choosing a target and developing a campaign strategy a) Discovering the size and importance of the investment Both large and small investments have their benefits and drawbacks as campaign targets. While the loss of a large investment has the opportunity to make a more tangible effect on a corporate policy, larger investments make more difficult targets. The loss of smaller investments, while not making a huge financial dent, may be easier to effect and are still effective in raising awareness about Israeli apartheid and BDS and create spaces for future campaigns. Note that the size and importance of investments are always relative to the overall investments an institution holds and the availability of alternative investments. b) Assessing the likelihood that a given fund will divest based on its specific guidelines Many banks and funds have ethical guidelines or have made commitments to ethical standards such as the UN Global Compact. Elbit clearly violates international law, human rights and the basic principles of the UN Global Compact. Activists may choose to campaign for the adoption of some sort of binding ethical guidelines as a first step to divestment and this may be a good way to build alliances with other campaign groups interested in ethical investment. c) Assessing the likelihood for divestment from a particular company based on a fund’s record of divestment Some investment funds and banks are particularly conscious of their image as ethically responsible investors. They may have a history of divesting from unethical companies. The history of a financial institution can be useful in gauging the likely success of a campaign and can provide useful precedents. d) Gaining support from stakeholders If a financial institution manages funds for a public or third sector body such as churches, trade unions or universities, these stakeholders may be sympathetic to the campaign and be able to provide additional pressure. e) Using legal mechanisms International and human rights law can be a useful tool in divestment campaigns, both with state and government investments and pension funds as well as when targeting private institutions. The Apartheid Wall is being built in defiance of international and humanitarian law, and in disregard of the 2004 International Court of Justice (ICJ) decision. As such, companies in states that incorporate international law into their national legal system can be prosecuted in national courts. For example, Veolia and Alstom, two French multinationals are on trial in French courts for violations of international law through their involvement in the Jerusalem Light Rail system that aims to cement Israel’s hold on Occupied East Jerusalem. Links to more information: Source Stop the Wall * Factsheet on Elbit:http://www.stopthewall.org/downloads/pdf/Elbit-fc.pdf * Factsheet on companies building the Wall:http://www.stopthewall.org/downloads/pdf/companiesbuildingwall.pdf * Photo Story: Palestinian grassroots activists: Boycott Elbit, CRH and Magal!http://www.flickr.com/photos/stopthewall/sets/72157623643733905/show/with/4489575603/ * To see a list of current investors in Elbit, go to:http://www.nasdaq.com/asp/holdings.asp?symbol=ESLT&selected=ESLT * Recommendation to the Norwegian Ministry of Finance by the Council on Ethics of the Government Pension Fund – Global, May 15 2009, http://www.regjeringen.no/en/dep/fin/Selected-topics/The-Government-Pension-Fund/Ethical-Guidelines-for-the-Government-Pension-Fund—Global-/Recommendations-and-Letters-from-the-Advisory-Council-on-Ethics/the-council-on-ethics-recommends-that-th.html?id=575451 More links: * TIAA-CREF: Divest from the occupation,http://www.jewishvoiceforpeace.org/campaigns/tiaa-cref-divest-occupation (see in particular the JVP Elbit factsheet,https://salsa.democracyinaction.org/o/301/images/Profiles-Elbit.pdf) * Elbit Systems – Wandering Raven * War Profiteer of the Month: Elbit Systems, February 2010,http://www.wri-irg.org/node/9663 * Scandinavian financial institutions drop Elbit due to BDS pressure Adri Nieuwhof, 19 February 2010http://electronicintifada.net/v2/article11084.shtml * A big thank you, Ilan Pappe, 4 September 2009,http://electronicintifada.net/v2/article10752.shtml Sources: http://icj10.stopthewall.org/elbit-systems http://www.securityfence.mod.gov.il/ http://www.whoprofits.org/Company%20Info.php?id=554 http://www.regjeringen.no/en/dep/fin/Selected-topics/The-Government-Pension-Fund/Ethical-Guidelines-for-the-Government-Pension-Fund—Global-/Recommendations-and-Letters-from-the-Advisory-Council-on-Ethics/the-council-on-ethics-recommends-that-th.html?id=575451 http://www.ww4report.com/node/2743 http://www.stopthewall.org/2010/05/28/deutsche-bank-we-are-out-elbit http://www.responsible-investor.com/home/article/ap3/ Key Elbit subsidiaries: Azimuth Technologies Elbit Systems Land and C4I Ltd (ESLC) Electro-Optics – Elop Ltd (Elop) Elisra Electronic Systems Ltd International Technology Lasers (ITL) Tadiran Electronic Systems Ltd. and Tadiran Spectralink Ltd.       3 years ago   Apartheid Wall, Divestment, Drones, Elbit Systems   Security and Weapons                Tweet                         Join the conversation  Cancel Reply        Notify me of follow-up comments by email. Notify me of new posts by email.              Reply      P M K - 3 months ago     Elbit systems operates in Singapore and I suspect that the Singapore Government has invested heavily in Elbit as well. Singapore may be using its Pension a Funds via Temasek Holdings . Can I get someone to help me expose the se things publicly here in Singapore.        Pings & Trackbacks   Canadian government attempts to end free speech and silence this list | The Fifth Column  Thúc đẩy Israel ngừng phân biệt chủng tộc – Tẩy chay các sản phẩm và công ty sản xuất ← Sĩ Quan Trừ Bi XV  Com queda da Odebrecht, Elbit, fabricante israelense de drones, tenta decolar no Brasil | Curtis Ryals Reports  Lava Jato entregou segurança militar a Israel – Falando Verdades  Israel já tenta controlar tecnologia militar brasileira                Follow @BDSlist                                

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














BDS INVESTMENTS LLC - OLATHE, KS - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



KS



OLATHE



Investors, Nec



Investors, Nec



                            BDS INVESTMENTS LLC
                                    



 





















B 


BDS INVESTMENTS LLC
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



14615 S BLACKFEATHER DR OLATHE, KS 66062
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2004
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $130,000.00
 Employee Count --
 Industries Investors, Nec
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2004, Bds Investments Llc has been providing Investors, Nec from Olathe. Bds Investments Llc has estimated annual revenues of $130,000.00 and also employs an estimated 2 employees. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.
















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version























 




BDS International LLC 






























                Loading...
            








Toggle navigation








 





Connected Investors is...


|




Connect



Find
it



Figure
it



Fund
it



Flip
it



Seller


Property



Funds




Buyer

 
Steve Dutton, NC
Flipped over 75 properties
Connected Investor
Watch his story &raquo





Become a Connected Investor &raquo










 


BDS International LLC

                                    BDS International LLC is a real estate company with 1 employee(s). Big Dave Entenmann is the Owner. This company has been part of Connected Investors since 04/22/2010 - BDS International LLC Based out of MOUNT VERNON, WA.   Connect with the employees and team members of BDS International LLC on Connected Investors.                                


View More 



Company Team Results








Big Dave Entenmann

Owner
                :
                BDS International LLC 




 
  

Bio: 

 









                View BDS International LLC Properties
            


This Week's Top 5 Trending Posts, Resources, & News Stories For Real Estate Investors: 1) How to find cash buyers in your town2) How to get a REI deal funded in half the time3) How to really find deals for 30 cents on the dollar4) FINALLY a REAL flip this house show - For people in the industry5) How to find investors based off location & the type of property they buy




Connected Investors Funding
LOOKING FOR DEALS TO FIX & FLIP?  View OFF-MARKET Bank Owned Properties 100% FREE. Tap Here




 

























BDS INVESTMENTS LLC - AURORA, CO - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CO



AURORA



Investors, Nec



Investors, Nec



                            BDS INVESTMENTS LLC
                                    



 





















B 


BDS INVESTMENTS LLC
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



15550 E 6TH AVE AURORA, CO 80011
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2011
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $92,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Investors, Nec
 Contacts 






Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2011, Bds Investments Llc has been providing Investors, Nec from Aurora. Bds Investments Llc has estimated annual revenues of $92,000.00 and also employs an estimated 2 employees. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com







Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

























 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Submit Your Product or Invention Idea | Davison












1-800-326-4807

Submit Your Idea
Our inventing team has been helping individuals with their product ideas for 25 years. We design and develop working product samples and present them to corporations.






Get help with your idea
Complete the Idea Security Agreement for your free Inventor's Guide!




First Name



Last Name





Address





City



State



Zip Code





Country

  UNITED STATES
  AFGHANISTAN
  ALBANIA
  ALGERIA
  AMERICAN SAMOA
  ANDORRA
  ANGOLA
  ANGUILLA
  ANTARCTICA
  ANTIGUA AND BARBUDA
  ARGENTINA
  ARMENIA
  ARUBA
  AUSTRALIA
  AUSTRIA
  AZERBAIJAN
  BAHAMAS
  BAHRAIN
  BANGLADESH
  BARBADOS
  BELARUS
  BELGIUM
  BELIZE
  BENIN
  BERMUDA
  BHUTAN
  BOLIVIA
  BOSNIA HERCEGOVINA
  BOTSWANA
  BOUVET ISLAND
  BRAZIL
  BRITISH INDIAN OCEAN TERRITORY
  BRUNEI DARUSSALAM
  BULGARIA
  BURKINA FASO
  BURUNDI
  BYELORUSSIAN SSR
  CAMBODIA
  CAMEROON
  CANADA
  CAPE VERDE
  CAYMAN ISLANDS
  CENTRAL AFRICAN REPUBLIC
  CHAD
  CHILE
  CHINA
  CHRISTMAS ISLAND
  COCOS (KEELING) ISLANDS
  COLOMBIA
  COMOROS
  CONGO, REPUBLIC OF
  CONGO, THE DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC OF
  COOK ISLANDS
  COSTA RICA
  COTE D'IVOIRE
  CROATIA
  CUBA
  CYPRUS
  CZECH REPUBLIC
  CZECH REPUBLIC
  DENMARK
  DJIBOUTI
  DOMINICA
  DOMINICAN REPUBLIC
  TIMOR-LESTE
  ECUADOR
  EGYPT
  EL SALVADOR
  ENGLAND
  EQUATORIAL GUINEA
  ERITREA
  ESTONIA
  ETHIOPIA
  FALKLAND ISLANDS (MALVINAS)
  FAROE ISLANDS
  FIJI
  FINLAND
  FRANCE
  FRENCH GUIANA
  FRENCH POLYNESIA
  FRENCH SOUTHERN TERRITORIES
  GABON
  GAMBIA
  GEORGIA
  GERMANY
  GHANA
  GIBRALTAR
  GREAT BRITAIN
  GREECE
  GREENLAND
  GRENADA
  GUADELOUPE
  GUAM
  GUATEMALA
  GUERNSEY
  GUINEA
  GUINEA-BISSAU
  GUYANA
  HAITI
  HEARD ISLAND AND MCDONALD ISLANDS
  HONDURAS
  HONG KONG
  HUNGARY
  ICELAND
  INDIA
  INDONESIA
  IRAN, ISLAMIC REPUBLIC OF
  IRAQ
  IRELAND
  ISLE OF MAN
  ISRAEL
  ITALY
  JAMAICA
  JAPAN
  JERSEY
  JORDAN
  KAZAKHSTAN
  KENYA
  KIRIBATI
  NORTH KOREA
  SOUTH KOREA
  KUWAIT
  KYRGYZSTAN
  LAO PEOPLE'S DEMOCRATIC REPUBLIC
  LATVIA
  LEBANON
  LESOTHO
  LIBERIA
  LIBYAN ARAB JAMAHIRIYA
  LIECHTENSTEIN
  LITHUANIA
  LUXEMBOURG
  MACAU
  MACEDONIA, REPUBLIC OF
  MADAGASCAR
  MALAWI
  MALAYSIA
  MALDIVES
  MALI
  MALTA
  MARSHALL ISLANDS
  MARTINIQUE
  MAURITANIA
  MAURITIUS
  MAYOTTE
  MEXICO
  MICRONESIA, FEDERATED STATES OF
  MOLDOVA, REPUBLIC OF
  MONACO
  MONGOLIA
  MONTSERRAT
  MOROCCO
  MOZAMBIQUE
  MYANMAR
  NAMIBIA
  NAURU
  NEPAL
  NETHERLANDS
  NETHERLANDS ANTILLES
  NEUTRAL ZONE
  NEW CALEDONIA
  NEW ZEALAND
  NICARAGUA
  NIGER
  NIGERIA
  NIUE
  NORFOLK ISLAND
  NORTHERN MARIANA ISLANDS
  NORWAY
  OMAN
  PAKISTAN
  PALAU
  PANAMA
  PAPUA NEW GUINEA
  PARAGUAY
  PERU
  PHILIPPINES
  PITCAIRN
  POLAND
  PORTUGAL
  PUERTO RICO
  QATAR
  REUNION
  ROMANIA
  RUSSIA
  RWANDA
  SAINT HELENA
  SAINT KITTS AND NEVIS
  SAINT LUCIA
  SAINT PIERRE AND MIQUELON
  SAINT VINCENT AND THE GRENADINES
  SAMOA
  SAN MARINO
  SAUDI ARABIA
  SENEGAL
  SEYCHELLES
  SIERRA LEONE
  SINGAPORE
  SLOVAKIA
  SLOVENIA
  SOLOMON ISLANDS
  SOMALIA
  SOUTH AFRICA
  SGATSI
  SPAIN
  SRI LANKA
  SUDAN
  SURINAME
  SVALBARD AND JAN MAYEN ISLANDS
  SWAZILAND
  SWEDEN
  SWITZERLAND
  SYRIAN ARAB REPUBLIC
  TAIWAN
  TAJIKISTAN
  TANZANIA, UNITED REPUBLIC OF
  THAILAND
  TOGO
  TOKELAU
  TONGA
  TRINIDAD AND TOBAGO
  TUNISIA
  TURKEY
  TURKMENISTAN
  TURKS AND CAICOS ISLANDS
  TUVALU
  UGANDA
  UKRAINE
  UNITED ARAB EMIRATES
  UNITED KINGDOM
  URUGUAY
  USSR
  UZBEKISTAN
  VANUATU
  HOLY SEE (VATICAN CITY STATE)
  VENEZUELA
  VIET NAM
  VIRGIN ISLANDS (BRITISH)
  VIRGIN ISLANDS (U.S.)
  WALLIS AND FUTUNA
  WESTERN SAHARA
  YEMEN
  YUGOSLAVIA
  ZAIRE
  ZAMBIA
  ZIMBABWE
  OTHER (NOT LISTED)





Email



Phone




By clicking the “Next” button below as my electronic signature, I expressly consent to being contacted about Davison’s services by phone call, auto-dialed phone call including prerecorded voice messages, text messages or email at any number or email address I provide. I understand that my consent is not a requirement for purchase of services.





Fee based service


Step 1 of 4








Our products have sold in over 1200 stores, including:


Our method is 100%  Confidential and Secure





































Fast, Quick, & Fair Business Funding | Instant Business Loans, Cash, & Funding | Business Factoring Services | Fast Capital 360








































































































 
 
 



Programs

Small Business Funding
Merchant Cash Advances
Business Line of Credit
Bad Credit Loans
SBA Loans
Unsecured Business Funding
Cash Flow
Short Term Business Funding
Working Capital
Microloans


Why Us?
Company
FAQs
Reviews
Careers
Contact
  (800) 735-6107
Apply Now
 













 





Exceptional Business Funding That is Fast, Simple & Transparent 

Estimate Your Terms 

This will not affect your credit score 

 


 



 















×
Need a quick estimate?Results within seconds!
Based on this informationYou may qualify for









$


*Please enter in valid Annual Revenue








FastCapital360 will not share your information with 3rd parties.Your security and privacy are our priority.










Ready to get started?
Apply Now
This tool creates an estimate based on your annual revenue and time in business. This is not a guaranteed offer of funding. Whether your business would qualify for funding is subject to full underwriting and lender approval.Need more than the estimate?Call a Business Advisor at (800)-735-6107.

















Apply Take 10 minutes to fill out basic financial information and apply for the amount of funding you need.   


Get Approved 99% of our applicants receive approval status within 1 hour of completing our online application.   


Start Using Your Funds Once approved, cash will be funded to your bank account within 1 business day.   


Get Started! Apply within minutes and get approved today!
Apply Today!   

























We’ve provided over $300 million in funding to more than 12,000 businesses.


Fast & Transparent Funding With Innovation & Reliability




$300 MillionFunded to Businesses

$300 Million Funded to BusinessesSince its inception in 2009, Fast Capital 360 has funded more than $300 million to thousands of businesses across the United States, in hundreds of different industries.   




Expertly TrainedLoyal Personal Advisors 

Expertly Trained Loyal Personal AdvisorsLoyal personal advisors focused on the most efficient way to help grow your business from start to finish. Anytime.  




60 MinutesAverage Approval Time

60 Minutes Average Approval TimeThanks to a cutting-edge, paperless pre-application process, Fast Capital 360 is able to approve most programs in less than an hour.  




We Value Your TimeYour Time is Money

Your Time is MoneyWe value that. Our process is fast and our advisors are always accessible, ready, and responsive.  




300 BusinessesFunded Every Month

300 Business Funded Every MonthOur mission is to be an asset and a resource to businesses. We've assisted an average of 300 businesses every month thus far.
  




Flexible FundsMultiple Options

Flexible Funds with Multiple OptionsOne place, multiple options for inventory, expansion, equipment, working capital and more.  




98%Satisfaction Rating

98% Satisfaction RatingWe put our customers first, and own a 98% satisfaction rating. Check out our reviews on TrustPilot. Trustpilot Reviews  




Data SecurityAdvanced Bank-Grade Security 

We Take Security SeriouslyWe use the most advanced bank-grade security to connect to view your business accounts. We never capture or store your personal information.  Pay Only For What You Use, With No Hidden Costs or Prepayment PenaltiesIntroducing Streamline Revolving Business Credit
Up to $50,000 revolving business credit.
No obligation to take funds.
Straight forward transparent fees with no surprises.
No prepayment penalty.
Borrow more as you repay.
Never pay double interest.

As a small business owner, you require flexibility. Streamline revolving business credit gives you the flexibility to draw the working capital that you need, when you need it. You pay only for the money that you use, with no hidden costs or prepayment penalties. Running a small business is hard. Getting access to the working capital you need is easy.Apply Now!


Getting started is fast, easy, and won’t impact your credit score.





Instant Business Financing: Your Way Forward
Taking your business to the next level requires a few things: hard work, ingenuity, determination and the cash flow to make your vision a reality. Money doesn’t grow on trees, but it does grow companies.
You guide the funding, we provide it. Simple. Quick. Transparent.
In the rapidly-changing world of commerce, businesses require solutions that move just as fast as the economy they are a part of. Cash flow loans shouldn’t require waiting months; they should enable owners and operators to get the job done as soon as they can.
Old-school avenues to small business financing require six-month waiting periods, excellent credit history and filling out dozens of pages of paperwork. Bank loans are often reserved for those with excellent credit, plenty of collateral and the luxury of being able to wait months for approval. Traditional lenders make their process time-consuming and complex, with multiple identity checks and proofs of ownership. Our business financing ethos is different.
Fast Capital 360 gives you the amount of funding you need in days, not weeks or months. We’ve built our business funding company around the idea that you shouldn’t have to wait, you should be able to receive your cash flow quickly.
Since 2009, our instant small business financing services have enabled thousands of companies to realize their fullest potential. We believe in the power of the local economy, and we want to influence it to do great things; that’s why we work with small business owners across the country.  Our instant business loans fuel innovation from coast to coast.
Whether you’re in the market for SBA loans or unsecured funding, we’re here to provide you with the funds you need.


HOW FAST IS FAST?10 minutes stands between you and knowing how much funding you qualify for. Your small business loan can arrive in your bank account in as little as one business day. No collateral required.
The average online application process takes less than 10 minutes and is only a page long. Once your financing program is approved, your working capital funding can arrive by the end of the next business day.
WE KEEP THINGS EASY & QUICKThere are no long clauses to wade through, no complicated terms and conditions, just plain language that clearly defines what you’re getting in a fast approval business loan. Fast Capital 360 is a member of the Responsible Business Lending Coalition; we were founded on the principles of lending fairness and transparency. We aren’t here to put you in debt; we’re here to fund the American dream.
QUALIFICATIONS?To qualify for instant funding, your small business needs to have been in operation for more than a year, have a revenue of at least $180,000, and you need to have a personal credit score of 500 or more. Our quick business lending is unsecured, so you don’t have to pledge personal assets or collateral just to receive a loan.



Get a Business Loan Today
We designed our process around getting small businesses the money they need quickly. Fast is in our name for a reason. Our application takes next to no time so you can get back to doing what you do best — running your business.
We’ve been voted the best small business funding company by CrowdReviews.com because of our dedication to supporting the economy that we are all a part of with fast approval loans.
The process of receiving funding for your expansion, your repairs, your staffing or your vision shouldn’t make running your business any more difficult. This is instant business funding without the hassle. We want you to have your money quick; you probably have better things to do than wait around for an approval letter.
From microloans to new property purchases, our fast funding process has been there for thousands of businesses. We offer multiple business loan options from lending that functions like a credit card to those that work the same as a bank loan, all with cash delivered faster than ever before.
Whether you have questions about receiving instant restaurant funding or your current working capital funding, our small business advisors are standing by six days a week to help.
Business factoring services allow you to know the exact amount you’ll pay and make our funding work even faster. Through our proprietary business analysis, we determine a precise factor rate that is included in our financing program. This business factor rate is included in the fast approval loan. Where banks charge interest rates, our business factoring services clearly outline how much is to be included in each payment from the start to the finish of the term.
Rather than taking out another credit card, our online business lending services allows you a safer alternative that provides you with more accessible business cash and less likelihood of accruing debt. Better than the banks, our commercial financing programs get business owners the money they need faster than anyone else.
A quick business funding solution that encompasses every need? That’s Fast Capital 360.
Still on the fence?
For more information on why Fast Capital 360 is the best choice for shaping your business into what you know it can be, call us today at 800-735-6107 or contact us online.
























  Trustpilot  






Funding Types 




SBA Loans
Online Business Financing
Merchant Cash Advances
Cash Flow Lenders
Business Funding Options







Unsecured Business Funding
Working Capital Financing
Bad Credit Loans
Line of Credit
Inventory Financing
Business Loan For Women



 



 



Our Funding

 Overview 
 Why Choose Us 
 Industries We Serve 
 Do You Qualify 



 



About FC360 




 Working With Us 
 Company 
 Testimonials 
 FAQs 







 Privacy Policy 
 Legal 
 Giving Back 
 Sitemap 
 Contact Us 







Follow Us
FacebookTwitterLinkedin



 



Business Center 




Small Business Blog
Short Term Funding
Small Business Funding
Business Equipment Funding





Contact Us
 Phone: (800) 735-6107


 
 












 Trustpilot 


© Copyright Fast Capital 360. Fast Capital 360 is a D/B/A of iVest 360, LLC. - 95 James Way #113
Southampton, PA 18966
	




















Programs

Small Business Funding
Merchant Cash Advances
Business Line of Credit
Bad Credit Loans
SBA Loans
Unsecured Business Funding
Cash Flow
Short Term Business Funding
Working Capital
Microloans


Why Us?
Company
FAQs
Reviews
Careers
Contact
  (800) 735-6107
Apply Now






























